According to the website Futility Closet, even "spam," those pesky emails trying to convince you that someone desperately needs your money or has money they need to send you, etc., has been around for about 200 years.
If you listen all the way through, I thought the line about how to have a very long conversation with an 8-year-old was delightful.
It's probably important to let the police know that you have aspergers syndrome as early as possible and to ask to be able to talk in a less confrontational situation. In some cases, "taking a ride downtown" might be a safer option than trying to discuss it at the scene of the issue.
I am with thee to deliver thee. Jeremiah 1:8
It's available at both my TpT Store and my Teacher's Notebook Shop!! Head over to pick yours up today! Also, I'm in the process of finishing up my Reading Workstation version of Beach Time!, so check back soon! :)
Better than before, but it still looked kind of incomplete. Something was missing...so I added some orangish flowers, maple leaves, and a cute li'l birdie; all of them streaked with copper tones.
Christie also attempted to mislead the public by closing some authorities and commissions in 2011. But they had been empty for years. They were paper agencies. Not a single job was eliminated.
I see Marabella residents have Carolyn Seepersad-Bachan on blast. I find that protest reeks of a political performance…all they missing is black costumes, white face and a tableaux vivant! It’s worth noting that some of the “angry residents” yesterday are actually friends of people at the San Fernando regional corporation…and if you didn’t know, there is tension between Mayor Marlene and MP Carolyn….make of that what you will…more than the pestle in the mortar with this one!
Souvik & I went to Goa with our friend Anshu; drove 24 hours to stay 36 hours in Goa; but it was such fun. Here’s the sunset after a particularly exhilarating parasailing attempt by Anshu & me.
On a basic level, this is an embarrassment for the education “reform” community. If we leave gloating aside, however, there is something we can learn from these scandals and the cheating scandals listed above: looking for short-term “silver bullets” and the Lone Rangers who supposedly have them chambered doesn’t make sense when you’re dealing with social institutions that are so profoundly shaped by forces of race, class, poverty, public policy on all three levels of government, and geography. As in life, regular sustainable improvements are both more achievable or sustainable then moon-shots.
So much wonderful goodness here and wow stamps, papers, and I love the gorgeous card she made for me. What a special lady she is, if you would like to visit her creative blog just click HERE.
1) All books that are part of a continuing series qualify (i.e. Debbie Macomber's Cedar Cove, Janet Evanovich's Stephanie Plum, James Patterson's Alex Cross, etc. etc.)
I hit a wall, however, when it came to the issue of health management. Mr CJ needs to have a phone to receive medical appointments. If I didn't have a phone for him to call me on if there was ever a problem, I wouldn't be able to leave him alone at all, and then would hardly be able to leave the house at all. If there is an emergency, I have to be able to call for help, or, realistically, it could seriously increase the chances of either Mr CJ or me having an untimely death. Things really are that drastic when you are living with serious health problems. I realised that I am trapped, held in bondage to capricious corporations whose computers can just spit out any numbers they like and put one's life - or at least one's credit rating - into turmoil. I seriously considered suicide - for the first time in quite a while. If I can't live without telephones, well then, I'd rather not live at all. That might sound drastic, but that's the nature of a phobia - unnecessarily drastic.
So there was much shuffling and twitching from the opening credits onwards, with lots of distracing comments aired, like 'isn't that the Yangtzee River?'. My dad was eye-rolling for Britain.
One day* my Pinterest dreams will become reality.
Anna Jackson / Kindness to horses / 65-66
As you can tell, the eyeshadow is fairly deep in colour and it's also very pigmented. Each of the shadows I'm reviewing are a different degree of shimmer/glittery-ness due to the colour/glitter combo. This shade is actually quite sparkly, with very fine shimmer particles. However they are ever so subtle when you apply it on your eyelids. It is a perfect crease colour, but can also be used really well as the main base shadow for a sultry smokey eye. Since the eyeshadow is really fine and powdery, it's very easy to blend.
You can choose to use any or all of these, or other fruits that hold symbolic meaning to your own magickal purposes.
The story was an alien invasion sort of thing: One group of aliens has come to escape the other group of aliens, who are intent on occupying Earth. The first group must defend the helpless planet against the evil aliens while keeping alive themselves. The Earth-is-a-battleground-for-supernatural-powers thing.
the night everything changed --
OK, that's great! He reads my blog, he's going to see where I Twittered about the "weirdo who sat down next to me at the library", he's going to stalk me and kill me. At least that line of thinking spurred me on to write another 1000 words so I could at least finish my book before meeting my demise.
A) This is my personal story and that's why it's important
Of course, none of this is convincing to Protestants who made up their theological minds before consulting Scripture. Once people do that, cries for basing everything on Holy Writ become basically meaningless exercises in polemics. Scripture should mold us, not the other away around. At the very least, for this Article to say that Purgatory is repugnant to scripture is simply wrong. You can argue that maybe these verses do not support the doctrine of Purgatory, but the Bible never clearly says Purgatory is a repugnant doctrine unto the Lord. At best, it is a stalemate.
So, I was feeling rather blank and kept waiting for the elusive inspiration to come! Finally, one afternoon Addie made a random little comment: she said that she wanted to "make flags for all of her friends". And I finally had ideas, with which I made a loose sketches to keep for later.
18. Lovin' On Borrowed Time
In The Autobiography, contextualization of the father-son relationship is upfront; the memoir is addressed to Franklin’s son. In it, the fact that Franklin extensively genealogizes his extended families and ancestors supports this father-son interrelational framing because this genealogical section of The Autobiography is predominantly male oriented – centers around the patriarchs of his family. In other words, the fact that his arduous, genealogical project centrally revolves around male relationships indicates that it is primarily concerned with the retention and continuation of the family’s patriarchal legacy onto his sons, grandsons, and so forth. Of course, this is understandable – Franklin is a man of patriarchal era. The very first sentence reveals Franklin’s patriarchal disposition, or, more specifically, his genealogical frame of mind: “I have ever had a Pleasure in obtaining any little Anecdotes of my Ancestors” (538). Franklin’s deep interest and utmost respect for his ancestors are evident here. Accordingly, as a patriarch who feels that it is his duty to continue the family legacy, Franklin spells out his purpose of The Autobiography: my “posterity may like to know” (538), particularly, about him and his ways of life. Thus, Franklin’s patriarchal mentality – his interest in compiling and disseminating the work of the genealogy and his biography to his male descendants (sons and grandsons) – frames his writing, The Autobiography, in the context of father-son interrelationship.
Dear Raegan,
With one hand you won't ease me,
Jesus was claimed to stand on the Mountain with Elijah and Moses. These would be the three figures which had the most miracles surrounding them in the Bible. Moses, representing the law and Elijah, the prophets. In Luke Jesus spoke to Moses of Jesus departure( in Greek exodus ).
My prayers are with Rosie and his wife (and my dear friend) Barb.
Additional Skills/Competencies:
HA! See! Yes! Nail on the head! I pointed out, with intense fury, that the Federal Reserve didn’t merely want to hide inflation facts from the masses, it also wanted to conceal future bail outs of the euro. These ‘repurchase agreements’ were what the EU bankers and the Fed used in 2008 when the Fed SECRETLY lent them all, many of whom were private bankers and investment firms, over $16 trillion
Yet by the same evening, all of the stories had been removed from each of those sites. The updated links either directed one to a site’s home page or 404 error pages, reading “page not found.” What happened? The White House got a compliant media to scrub the story. Kristina Schake, Communications Director to the First Lady, confirmed this to Politico: “From the beginning of the administration, the White House has asked news outlets not to report on or photograph the Obama children when they are not with their parents and there is no vital news interest. We have reminded outlets of this request in order to protect the privacy and security of these girls.”
The right of self-defense is the first law of nature: in most governments it has been the study of rulers to confine this right within the narrowest limits possible. Wherever standing armies are kept up, and when the right of the people to keep and bear arms is, under any color or pretext whatsoever, prohibited, liberty, if not already annihilated, is on the brink of destruction." - Henry St. George Tucker
SHOWERS AND THUNDERSTORMS ARE EXPECTED THIS AFTERNOON AND EVENING. A FEW SEVERE THUNDERSTORMS WILL BE POSSIBLE… WITH LARGE HAIL AND DAMAGING WINDS BEING THE MAIN THREATS. A VERY MOIST AIRMASS WILL PROVIDE THE POTENTIAL FOR HEAVY RAIN AND LOCALIZED FLOODING.
Happy knitting!
Going forward, I hope we see more of Wes and Travis’ back-story, especially what their partnership was like at the beginning. With any luck these story lines will be explored in the couples therapy scenes, which are some of the best of the show. Not only do Michael Ealy and Warren Kole have great chemistry, but they also have really fun interactions with the rest of the therapy group, not to mention the therapist.
The building itself is a vandalism of the earth. Got no soul.
Article by Boyd Bailey.
I labeled this as "edutainment" because it is full of life lessons, and if I were starting out in the world I would turn to it as inspiration for not letting presumptions about my gender keep me from succeeding. After all, if not for her persistence, SNL would NEVER have aired the hilarious Kotex Classic commercial.
I used my regular base coat, NailTek II, 2 coats of Rated and no topcoat this time. It dried really fast and with a satin kind of finish - where have I been living the past months during the holo craze around the blogs? I thought these were rough to the touch! - and so I left it for once and saved a few drops of top coat, LOL!
Liesl looked at him curiously. “Why do you ask?”
1393 D-VIII/29(B)/2001. “A Tribute to Chief Justice Earl Warren.” .” Edward J. McFetridge American Inn of Court, San Francisco, California.
200ml/7oz double cream
It may be we shall rise the last as Frenchmen rose the first,
2nd Beach Pool – 11:02am
How to Swag
Let’s look a little closer at those Horatio Alger stories: Luck as much as pluck determines the hero’s fate, and often shows up in the guise of a benevolent benefactor who happens into the life of the boy in need and jump-starts him on the path to success.
To tie this back into the conversation that the professor and the student were having, the Professor makes claim that he believes in the natural evolutionary process, also noted as macro-evolution. Driscoll states it well in his book with a few points he brings up about macro-evolution.
Thursday, May 10th
As I opened this book, I was worried that it might just be another boring celebrity biography, hastily ghostwritten and churned out in time for Christmas. However, by the time I got to page seven, Simon Pegg had already poked fun at the phenomenon of the celebrity autobiography, which immediately raise my hopes for the rest of the book.
That's not to say that he was neglected, exactly. After his London publishers dumped him in the mid-nineties, Bloodaxe Books of Newcastle reissued his entire back-catalogue in three successive volumes of collected poems. He ended up being one of the most extensively available poets around: another factor in this being the decision of the Lannan Foundation in America to record his entire back-catalogue on a series of DVDs - 24 hours or so for him to read out 26 separate poetry collections.
We men – love getting flower everyday.
I also have to add that the treatment of the photographs to create the feeling of a classic painting is very appealing and welcoming. To me it gives me an impression of historical record, as though we need to remember that people with Down syndrome have lived in the time of Jesus, in the time of Da Vinci, and today. They may not have played a role that made a mark on history, but they were there. Mamedov has changed that now by including people with Down syndrome in a significant piece of art. Maybe he thought it was finally time.
But I believe that the DNA in the rainbow trout was created directly by God at a time in the past. Replacements for it are no longer being made. Therefore, to wipe it out of an existence would be to destroy the work of the greatest artist there is.
Always an eclipse in my universe.
"Oh, I'll gladly give up anything if only I may have a blue coat instead of a green and gold one," said the discontented little beetle.
Watch for a post when they actually looked like girls.
So far? Each of the women I have served this to have moaned in ecstasy and insisted on regular play dates.
"And the peace of God, which transcends all understanding, will guard your hearts and your minds in Christ Jesus."
Having therefore, brethren, boldness to enter into the holiest by the blood of Jesus, By a new and living way, which he hath consecrated for us, through the veil, that is to say, his flesh; And having an high priest over the house of God; Let us draw near with a true heart in full assurance of faith, having our hearts sprinkled from an evil conscience, and our bodies washed with pure water.
The army arrive the next day. Steely Russian soldiers with flamethrowers and rifles, they set up roadblocks and mercilessly gun down the wandering sick. As well as changing the feel of the town, you’ve got to remember that these developments all completely throw the black market economy you’ve learned to manipulate.
And he was that guy, that guy who never held you
Tactics: Only attempt to ram opponents from behind, so they don’t know that you’re coming, or on maps that don’t have armor lock as an option (which will destroy a ghost rather easily). The plasma bolts are strong and can get a lot of exposed enemies. As a driver, you’re constantly exposes from the sides so if you’re low on health feel free to burst out of harm’s way to replenish shields. As a bonus, ramming elites is even easier. Never get too close to the enemy or stuck in a corner- ghosts are very easy to hijack. As ghosts get damaged, their ‘wings’ get clipped making ramming a fair bit harder.
When my husband started this blog a year ago, I didn’t really know what to expect. We were both interested in exploring social networking and online communication and Michael had some observations about the world he wanted to share. We set up a simple blog (Thank you, WordPress!) and he got started. After a couple of weeks, I was so enjoying his posts that I got the urge to write something myself. The rest is history.
“An air cargo company showed up at the Chamber and asked about the possibility of making a flight to the Falklands and consulted us on possible business contacts. What we did was to contact local businesses but so far no one has turned up”, revealed Wild.
I also have extra copies of some back issues (#27, #28, #30, & The R. Crumb Edition) - for $16 you can have them all! I even have a Kids' Issue for $2 (pictured below). Basically, I will put together any kind of packet that will cause you to send me money.
all safe in the fold
The name comes from some MSN chat Jói and I had. We were deciding a name for the band and for some strange reason wanted to have a long name. This is what came out! No backstory or whatever. Just simple as that... For A Major Reflection is just too extreme…
But Joan was hot, plain and simple, and it wasn’t just my months-long dry spell. If it weren’t for her husband being twenty fucking feet away every goddamn minute, I might have attempted to do something about it. I knew she liked me. She had to. No chick hits you that hard, that often, without harboring some kind of sexual tension. Being her punching bag was as close to fucking as we were going to get.
As it transpired, very little. My mother was an intelligent woman, but she was not an intellectual. She read devotional books, or an occasional novel. The larger world held little interest for her, and, until she became an American citizen fifteen years after her arrival here, I never even heard her discuss politics. Apolitical people like my mother are not unusual; even so, looking back at the history through which she lived, I find it hard to comprehend how little it meant to her. On the other hand, being an alien resident with a green card, always feeling that at any moment she could be sent back, Mother did not live at the forefront of her life. Only after friends pushed her through the process of applying for citizenship, only after taking the oath and being able to check the box “U.S. Citizen” on forms — only then did she relax enough to look at the headlines. Now she belonged; now she could vote. Her very first presidential election was Adlai Stevenson and Eisenhower. The image of my mother wobbling off on my bike to vote for the first time remains distinct.
In a nice ‘pay-it forward’ role reversal, we raped the facilities and shade gazebos of the more upper class Klippies and Cola hotel. These people took Glamping to another level with perpetually filled with ice coolerboxes under gazebos, tents with REAL BEDS and duvets in them and ample space. We shared the shade and the cooler boxes because,…we didn’t give them a choice. (And they didn’t even have a fence to break down.)
My guruji, had approached and been turned away by many, many veda gurus, because she was a woman. When she was 37 years old and had lost all hope she ‘took a chance’ and approached Sri Padmanabha Aithal.
There are a few more giveaway events that will be shipped and then products will be back in stock after the first of the year. A few new products will be available too.
As last year, I will have a slideshow running on Max's
Aspirants, seekers, Light Workers, good luck to your ascension Path!
2 tablespoons rum
Last week was the birthday week in our house, husband and son, one day apart; many dinners and a big BBQ with friends and new neighbors. Now it is time to write all those thank you notes! It's hard to find cute notes for boys to write- so many girly things out there, but not so much for the masculine half. I also wanted to make something quick and fairly simple since "we" have a bunch to write (i.e. mommy makes us write)!
Lest my assessment was due to my hunger, I returned the following year to see if the chili had really been as good as I had thought. This time I went in the afternoon for lunch. I ordered the chili once again and was not disappointed. The chili met my expectations and I decided that this was one of the best bowls of chili that I had eaten in any restaurant.
“Okay, but I’m going to slide down by the front and crouch so no one sees me.”
We'd cut the timing close so there was no time to horse around before walking onto the docks and floating structures that make up The Center for Wooden Boats, an educational facility for all ages that provides "a gathering place were maritime history comes alive through direct experience and our small craft heritage is enjoyed, preserved, and passed along to future generations." You can rent wooden sailing vessels there, learn to build your own wooden boats, or just drop by on Sunday afternoons for free sailing on one of their larger vessels.
I told her the best thing young people have done is make older people so paranoid that they think that everything means something obscene. She said he acts like someone who should be in an adult Special Ed class to learn how to act in public. I told her he was a master of his craft.
This week it is a real pleasure to honor a rising Hollywood star who has a great sense of activism and priorities. Josh Hutcherson, only 19, has been in films for half his life. He’s currently starring in the blockbuster book adaptation The Hunger Games. He also co-starred in the wonderful (but very dark) 2010 film The Kids Are Alright as one of two kids growing up with two lesbian parents. In a recent interview with E! Online, Hutcherson focuses on his work with the group Straight But Not Narrow.
Raven Nirvanni survives on the fringes of a shattered culture. While on a self-imposed suicide mission to annihilate an enemy destroyer, she encounters the imprisoned biomech. Deciding the fate of humanity far outweighs the destruction of a single ship, she recues him and decides to ensure he reaches his destination.
Finnerty: very tall, obviously. Mangum had never said that person who assaulted her was unusually tall.
To swell the gourd, and plump the hazel shells
The risk is real, the elephant exists, and it is rapidly gaining weight. And in the sober light of day we are confident that more insurance is the only viable solution. Although it may be difficult to recognize, even the CLASS Act is supposed to be an insurance program.
In the days ahead, join me in the next step toward that destination of November 6th, when across America we can give a sigh of relief and know that the Promise of America has been kept. The dreamers can dream a little bigger, the help wanted signs can be dusted off, and we can start again.
Okay, so here we are today, with the lovely Christine Fonseca! Her novella, DIES IRAE, is a fast, fun read. If you haven't gotten it yet, you should.
The film that came out last year wasn’t the first Captain America movie to hit theaters either. There was one that almost came out back in 1990. It was never released but was actually completed. (if you can call it completed) Look how boring the movie poster was compared to the new one. I guess it’s true, that newer is always and will always be, better.
-Thursday I missed most of the conference because we were waiting on a car, so Val and I hung around her house playing old Sega games and laughing our asses off at stupid shit. It has been WAY TOO LONG since I've just hung out at somebody's house playing old video games. Guitar Hero has nothing on ridiculous pixelated fighting games from the early 90's.
We went back to town for lunch, and then we walked through the shops for a bit before leaving to go home. We took our time driving home, and we stopped at a few outlets and for dinner along the way. We had a nice time, just the two of us, and Drew had a great time staying with Jim's mom!
Red Sox @ Orioles, 7:05 ET
but never forgets what I lost
But do not, for one second, think that you are better than me for doing so.
Ingram ~ With You ~ Other End ~ 1984
SCYTL is moving into or already running elections in: the United Kingdom, France, Canada, Norway, Switzerland, United Arab Emirates, South Africa, India and Australia.
We only know the tracklist because the fellow behind their early-mid 90s label Scat received a copy of the album in preparation for the 1995 box set compiling the band's pre-1992 records. The band had this album recorded, sequenced and "mastered" in 1991, only for Bob Pollard to decide not to release it. The tracks were (somewhat) farmed out to other projects instead, and snippets of (some) of the tracks were jammed together to form the track "Back To Saturn X Radio Report" on 1992's Propeller LP.
HOW CAN YOU WISH FOR THAT INFORMATION? IT WAS CONTAINED WITHIN YOUR PREVIOUS SENTENCE. THEY DIDN’T PLAY THERE AGAIN BECAUSE NO ONE SHOWED UP
We return and I try it on again.
Overall, open government activist David Eaves likes what he’s seeing and predicts an even larger impact.
You know how you know that you are getting older? When the only time you “drop it like it’s hot” is when you are doing jump squats when working out. And the only “grinding” that you are doing is coffee beans in the morning. Ok maybe those are extreme examples, but recently a couple of my friends and I started our Sunday Cooking club as a way for us to hang out (goodbye clubbing and bar hopping days?) Each month we are going to pick a theme and each person is going to bring a dish/ingredients in. Our first theme as Asian Cuisine!
WALT DISNEY PICTURES
the light
308) rain...lots of it, watering my garden over the last two days
It’s evening in a Cambridge MA supermarket. A customer approaches the checkout stand with a heavily laden cart; over the stand is a sign: “12 Items or Fewer”. When the customer reaches the cashier, she perceives that he is an undergraduate. She gives him a certain look, sighs, and says, “Well, either you’re from Harvard, and you can’t count; or you’re from MIT, and you can’t read.”
Favourite Quotes (there are a lot!)
“One reason they brought me in is to change that and I’m willing to give it my all and see what happens. I think if you win and our guys are out on campus and getting to know people I think people will come out win or lose.”
The water level in the lake varies from season to season. At times, the level recedes. At one visit, the water level was so high I couldn’t reach an old pier which did not stretch all the way to the shore line.
Mark Twain
CH: Yes, it took me five months to get on the dance floor of the milonga of Almagro, I didn't dare to, and I went every Sunday only to watch. One breathed an air of respect that cannot be found now. Maybe I still feel it in some milongas like Glorias Argentinas, La Baldosa or in places that are further from the circuit of younger tango. I also took that essence from you and the dancers of your generation. I feel that the people of today are not motivated, they don't want to work or research. They don't want to go to the bottom of the situation; they stay on the surface. This also has to do with the new movements and dynamics that are used, if they are not performed with some power they turn out cold.
Our wonderful sponsor this week is:
to you, this generation will not pass away until all these things take place.
...clean hair.
Geraint Thomas - Track specialist and good all-rounder - His main focus this year is on the Olympic Team Pursuit so won’t be racing much, but he is in this years Giro. Expect him to do well in short (~4km) prologues and in the flatter stages he is used as a lead-out man so expect to see him on the front with about 1-2km to go. Not a climber (yet but there’s time)
The only time I wish Chance were more steady on his feet is when we are out to the barn. He often gets parked in the stroller and left somewhere. He can't wait until he can run around and cause trouble in the barnyard.
Make my way back along a long-time conquered river,
When a person is knowledgeable, going great guns in his career, earning well, it is but obvious that he will be very satisfied with his life. He will not only be a much happier person but is likely to be very confident as well. A happy person will be productive in workplace and also good in his personal relationships.
More blankets? Yes. Extra scrap-booking supplies? NO!!!
Me: “But they are so much fun!!”
That first one is the "Classic Cheeseburger with a Twist". $10.50 for 1/3 # natural beef (still not sure what that means though) marinated in Island Spices with Gruyere Cheese, House Pickles, Tomato, Grilled Red Onion, Mayo, and Pub Mustard. A bit different, not bad at all, acceptable price for the nature of the Pearl I would think.
Booty pops were born. I actually saw this in a store recently. Just like inflatable bras, booty pops allowed a woman to fake something she doesn't have. She could now wear a piece of clothing that gives her more butt.
And then there’s the huge support you get from your fellow critters. And those fantastic cheers when one of you gets some good news.
I write this because it’s an issue that I believe parents should speak to their children about. Ask questions! I never thought my daughter could have a thought like that, but she did…whether it was an original or planted thought, it was a thought none the less!
A Christmas Story ... TBS ... 4 PM
11 - Keep of Kalessin - Ascendant
Scully bursts out laughing, compliments her reading skills y sends her off to me.
Updates from the National Sorghum Producers and the United Sorghum Checkoff Program will be given, as well.
Per Mårtensson
Okay, so now to finish cleaning the house, grab a shower and throw in some laundry. I need to go play mega millions (it is a down payment on a dream, people) and I have another post I want to write…hoping to have it up before the weekend is over. As always, thanks so much for stopping by and reading, and as always….enjoy your day!
This was definitely a challenge. I enjoyed how so many of us did themes. Like Clarissa Draper did her "Death by..." posts that left me in awe of the many ways people check out from this world.
I'm tired. Tiiiiiiired. Newborns kick your butt. Charlie may wake up twice a night or five times a night. He may take a bottle and fall back asleep. He may take a bottle and stay awake for three hours. Or worse, a bottle and stay awake for two hours and forty five minutes, only to allow you a ten-minute nap before he wakes up for another bottle. He may cry for the greater part of the night, looking at you with a scrunched up, beet-red face of anger that makes you wonder if you were accidentally poking him with a fork like a wrinkly baked potato. And then all too soon, Oliver is up, either yelling the ABC's, calling out "Mommy were aaaaaaare yoouuuuu?" or screaming because his blankets aren't arranged just right. It's 2pm before I have enough micro-naps to get up to 6 hours of sleep. And that's if I haven't showered or fed myself.
another realm of existence.
2...
I'm using a new colour called Volga. Why blue for a girls cardigan? It isn't a colour I normally have samples knit in so it will look good hanging in the store. I could go purple but that is so predictable. There is pink but still predictable. I like this one and it is going to look great when finished. Also, little girls can wear blue-just ask my sister. She wouldn't wear any colour but blue when she was young.
Because it's Tuesday I am linking up with IBOT! It's great to be home.
Jalike us guys let da odda guys go awready,
I was originally going to join all the blocks together with no sashing so there was a huge riot of pink and orange but then the Kona white I had been waiting on arrived and sashing became an option.
97. Please Don’t Eat The Daisies (Doris Day) – Just for fun.
Of course when DCS Williams gave evidence, Andy Coulson was still Director of Communications for the Prime Minister, Stephenson and Yates were still in place, Brooks and Hinton still worked for Rupert Murdoch, and the News of the World was the top-selling newspaper in Britain. How things change!
While doing some research recently, I came across a letter in a library archive written by Dr Richard Peto to Dr. B. MacGibbon. Peto was, and is, a highly respected epidemiologist who worked closely with Richard Doll on smoking and health.
But this fiver. What a fucking joke, I have recently realised. The final party of the season, before the welcome summer break, saw me delivering both Data and a stray child to the house of yet another little princess who had requested the aforementioned monetary gift. Data bore a thoughtlessly thrown together handmade card fashioned from twistables and a grubby sheet of A4, with a crumpled fin attached by a paperclip. Her backseat buddy had a card, an envelope containing a tenner and a fucking present. Wherefore. Toxic. Fudge. And it seems that this is the norm. Ask, and due to the chilling desperation of Northside Southside wannabes to appear richer than, or at the very least, as rich as, they are, ye shall receive a whole fuckload more.
and "The Girl Next Door," "Elephant," "The Man in the Iron Mask," "Absolute Force," "Texasville," "In the Shadow of Kilimanjaro," "Rollercoaster," "The White Dawn," "Love and Pain and the Whole Damn Thing" and "Johnny Got His Gun."
In large non- stick skillet, melt half the butter over medium heat. Cook 4 blintzes at a time, starting with seam-side-down, about 3 minutes on each side until golden brown. Place blintzes, seam-side-down, on serving platter; drizzle with maple syrup. Sprinkle with icing sugar and garnish with lemon slice if desired.
In 2002, Mayor Michael Bloomberg committed funds to recycle it as an urban path…
When a crime is committed against another person, there are at least two people who know about it. There is the victim, and there is the perpetrator. The victim IS NOT the only person who can go to the police. There is absolutely nothing to prevent a priest who has admitted abusing children from going to the police himself, confessing his crimes, and asking for the judgement of the court. All of this can be done without revealing the victim’s name, at all, and without even needing to put a victim on a stand. After all, if a priest confesses to his crimes, then there is no need to cross-examine the other witness(es), to determine the truth of the matter. Simple affidavits would do.
The final job was to net the gooseberries. I'm not a fan of bamboo canes for netting as I find they tend to snap and break too easily. So over the winter I got some proper timber and cut twenty-four posts, over which the netting will be laid. I banged in all the posts and now just need to get some new netting to complete the job. It will be a while before the goosegogs flower and fruit, so there's plenty of time.
The main cake is a 10" triple-chocolate cake: Chocolate-layered sponge, sandwiched with Nutella butter cream, frosted with plain butter cream and surrounded with Kit-Kat chocolate bars. The owl and congrats message are made from marshmallow fondant.
08 Break The Spell
NOTE: Verily, verily, I say unto you, He that heareth my word, and believeth on him that sent me, hath everlasting life, and shall not come into condemnation; but is passed from death unto life. John 5:24
They fail to grasp the concept that online views are more vehement that those expressed face-to-face. Had they noted that the vast majority supported the manager but viewed last summer’s transfer activity – or the timing of it at the least – was, we’ll be polite, a bit of a balls-up, then threre could be little argument that this was the truth. Even then it is to degrees. Panic buying is a common theme; that suggests the players were ill-conceived in their purchase but third place is hardly a failure given the start to the season and if that is confirmed, represents a better achievement than 2010-11. There is, of course, Chu-young Park to contend with…
Last week Kevin and I were given the opportunity to tell our story to a room full of mostly nurses, a few doctors and other hospital staff at the Resolve Through Sharing bereavement training seminar held at Hoag Hospital. We sat on the parent panel with a few good friends from our support group. Although I don't particularly get shy while speaking in front of people, I did feel a bit nervous discussing our experience in front of a room full of strangers who may, or may not, be experienced with the death of a baby. I didn't prepare a speech or write down notes to help me remember specific details, it's all clear in my mind as if it happened yesterday. It's a story I've told dozens of times and one that I tell myself everyday so I don't forget a single moment.
John Mellencamp Jack and Diane US
To overcome this situation a holistic approach is required where we take inputs from facilities management and IT management and come up with complete picture of data center infrastructure usage and impact of business demand. Peter Drucker rightly said “If you can’t measure it, you can’t manage it”. This is very true for Capacity Management process. To effectively manage a data center IT managers should be able to see what is happening on both the IT and Infrastructure sides.
Saturday - 8 - 11 mile long run outside (6am - 7:30am)
I slide my hand along the contour of his back. The muscles under my palm are large and solid. They twitch and quiver, recovering for the previous hour’s exertion. Bringing my hand to the side of his face, we make eye contact and I wonder what he thinks of me as he turns his head away. Some call it crazy, and others call it useless. But I swear, those big, black eyes of his can see me. The fact that some sort of connection can be made between the two of us still blows my mind. But him and I, though vastly different, are both expressions of life. And that, if nothing else, deserves to be honored.
That’s wrong! Get serious with your life today and make the right changes for
Here is the card that I made for the summer themed challenge. I know my card says Happy Spring, but believe me, here in Calgary Spring and Summer are pretty much the same thing..LOL you don't get a lot of distinction when you have snow up until May!
pressure canner
Many teachers are already aware of the free spelling activities, but did you know that they have a sentence-writing activity, too? This feature allows your students to use your own spelling words to create sentences and paragraphs online. I thought this activity was such a nice feature that I created a cooperative learning lesson to use as a prewriting activity before your students get on the computer. We've all experienced temporary brain freeze when sitting in front of a blank computer screen. The Spell & Write Sentences activity combats this problem by having them create sentences orally with a cooperative learning team before they ever sit down to type. The packet includes step-by-step directions for the computer part of the activity, too, so you can use it in a literacy center. The directions are different depending on whether or not you have a free account or a premium account, so I created two different sets of directions accordingly. Download this activity packet from my Spelling and Vocabulary page on Teaching Resources.
"Uh yeah," I said, feeling somehow guilty. I was wondering if this would be the time that DCFS came to take him away. "So, uh, shouldn't you notify DCFS about this? I mean, maybe they should take him away from me. You know, to make sure he doesn't break any more bones on my watch." At the nurse's blank stare, I quickly amended, "Kidding! Just kidding. I don't want him taken away. I mean, one day I'll probably be able to say that I'm the proud parent of a guy who stars on the show Jackass. And really, what more could a parent want.
Within the genre of pizza there is a huge range, of course--Neapolitan to Chicago-style to tavern pies (of which I had a fantastic exampe on this trip at Star Tavern in Orange, NJ). I'd call the groups on this range sub genres. But the bottom line is they're all pizza, and they're all interesting to me, sometimes as much for their membership in the genre as for their individual excellence.
You, little one are about 14-15 inches long and weigh about 2 lbs - the weight of a cauliflower! You're waking and sleeping at regular intervals, and I can most certainly tell when you're awake! Moving around all. the. time. But I love it dearly! You're probably opening and closing your eyes now, and look like a miniature whatever you'll look like when you're born. I wish I could peer inside of myself and see what you look like.
I don’t know where anything is. Everything is accessible only by car (or long walk to train/bus) and I don’t atually have a car – Mr J does, but he uses it almost always. We do still thankfully, have trams out this way. There are monstrous shopping complexes instead of strip shopping, large industrial estates, and streets apon streets of late 50’s and 60’s homogenous housing. Our neighbours are families with big dogs and rowdy kids. Street parking is free, and unlimited. None of the four house walls touch another. Mr J can work on his motorbike in our new shed. I can lie on the back lawn in the sun….
2 (32-ounce) containers chicken broth
out the hot corner
I cant believe another week has gone. The days seem to be speeding up...
‘The picture is that self-referral consciousness is infinite organizing power; it is the lively potential of Natural Law.’
#271 & #272 Josh Hancock / Freddy Sanchez (Red Sox)
Phillip sang “The Letter” by The Box Tops. Randy loved it that the 21-year-old singer made the song his own. J.Lo did not know the song, so she wasn’t sure if there was no melody. Steven indeed thought Phillip messed up the melody, but he could get away with it.
Site 5, the plot of land at Flatbush and Fourth avenues housing P.C. Richard and Modell's, is described as "significantly underutilized," as "Blank walls with no glazing and few breaks or entrances abut four public streets." That's an argument for greater development, according to the General Project Plan. What it doesn't say is that the site was developed by Forest City Ratner, which long had the right to build at a significant scale, and now has the option to build even bigger, with condemnation of the part of the property it doesn't control.
Well, my blogging friends, I spent all weekend working on putting away all of the miscellaneous "junk" that I had previously been collecting on my old scrapbook table. Everything is ... functional. I will never be 100% organized, nor do I want to be. I'm very adept and knowing where things are, even if they aren't in the "right" place, but what I did want was more space to spread out (check) and to lessen what I had surrounding me, as in, only the "essentials" on my table (check). Of course, I do have MORE on my table now than I did when I was upstairs, but that's only because I have more room for it. The biggest accomplishment was unpacking EVERYTHING that I was storing in my rolling tote and finding a "place" for it. This is a huge deal for me, because now when I go on retreats or go to crops, I don't have to unpack my tote of "stored items" just so I can repack it with what I'm taking. Talk about annoying.
After I read the quote, I immediately thought about beautifully bloomed flowers after rain showers. For my card, I used Morning Glory Digi for the image and colored it with Copic markers. Then I cut out the image with SB Label 12 Nestabilities. I also paper pieced the flowers for the dimension and added Glossy Accents to mimic the dews. (Hope you see them…it really looks great!) I used one of the sentiments from Garden Sentiments Digi Set for the saying. The background was used Prima designer paper and the bottom edge was punched with MS edger punch. I used the wide striped ribbon and embellished with silver pearls.
Lemon Meringue Pie
4Acting with deceit, got food together as if for a long journey; and took old food-bags for their asses, and old and cracked wine-skins kept together with cord;
On a lighter note, I came across a pic or two of this girl, Irina Shayk, a Russian born model. She surely uses what she got to look lovely. Love her tan and those curly hair. She really has a pair of never ending, sexy, well shaped legs. But I'll bet my bottom dollar, if you asked her, she will complain about something she is not happy with.I will also bet you the guy in her life thinks she is a perfect 10!
"It's not that I feel that school is a good idea gone wrong, but a wrong idea from the word go. It's a nutty notion that we can have a place where nothing but learning happens, cut off from the rest of life."
Despite the fact I lived in England from 1981-1983, I never made it to Scotland, so I'm really looking forward to the visit.
Hello folks, Maggie here. Wow - is anyone else amazed that it's already September? This year seems to be flying by. And here we are, ready to start our 71st challenge. Although, I guess we'd better pick a winner for number 70 first ;).
Hubby and I decided on a whim that we were gonna throw a Halloween party for Little Man and the neighbourhood kiddies. I'll be honest: It was epic. Now if you were to transplant our Spooky Fest into Any Town, North America, it would have been mediocre at best. In fact there wasn't anything we did that hasn't already been done before...in North America that is.
Going to a party? Sparkles are the key to standig out. Just don't over do it. A sparkly tank underneath a tailored blazer. A chunky pearl necklace and a glittery charm bracelet make a good statement. Pair with a ruffled skirt and tuck the tank in-so cute! If it's a little chilly for short skirts, colored or patterened tights are the key. To polish off a great dressy look wear chunky heels (jazz 'em up buy buying pairs with a bow on the heel, decorative zippers, peep toe, etc.) or knee-high boots (booties work too).
Angel Baltar: “But I think it’s safe to say that from now on your lives will be less eventful.”
Latinas love to dress sexy.
“I know who’s going to die, and isn’t going to be me,” I whispered. “Chinese water torture is too good for him. Splinter those bamboo chopsticks--the minute he gets home, they’re going under his fingernails.” I’d learned a few things from my father’s stories of ’Nam. And of course, by reading about the war. After all, I was a librarian. I’d read nearly every book on the shelves. Maybe I’d do a search on torture techniques.
That is not my style, I don’t urge people read it is their choices. But I do like chinese writer Zhu Wen, he is very cool, and deep.
To get this started, here’s today’s list of my top ten, in no particular order. It’d be a different list every day, but these are the tunes at the top of my favourites list today.
The way you are
Today was a busy day. I woke up for my 6 am strength training session with my trainer then came home to clean up. Grandmother and I took Tippie, my dog, to drop her at the vet for a follow up on her nail situation. Then I headed to my doctor's office to have a cyst removed. Then we drove 30 minutes away to pick up the end tables grandmother bought us, had lunch with hubby, took grandma shopping for a new lamp for us and then picked up Tippie from the vet. My cyst removal was at 930 and it was 4 before I got home to rest. Ouchie- driving hurts the incision. Ahhh time to eat dinner and try to rest more.
The Kinks
of light so quickly come and gone
And Amy's generous gift reminds me that it's again time to do my part for those in need. So I decided to donate to a local no-kill cat shelter, Furry Friends Refuge. They have several black kitties, who don't seem to find homes as quickly as the others. I used to make and donate little cuddle quilts to the cats at another shelter and hope to do so again. I'm sorry to wax philosophical here but Amy's gift really touched my heart. I hope if there's an opportunity for you to touch someone's life in a positive way, you'll take the time to do it. The good you do will come back to you!
Captivity. That’s an interesting word. Those who will not acknowledge me as a person in their lives have placed me in captivity; they would prefer that I remain locked up in their closet. Who is free? Neither of us. They have a closet door they are trying desperately to keep shut, and I just want to open the door–because it turns out, I am alive.
I haven't decided if I'll outright murder him or torture him first for hurting this little girl. There might be more to learn from the torture bit. We shall see how much he pisses me off in the course of the writing.
"For foreigners looking for a somewhat gritty and challenging experience in China that forces them to become self-reliant, develop a taste for spicy food and Baijiu, and learn to live and think like the Chinese, it can be a great adventure."
Religion is hardwired into humans. From the Stone Age onward, we have created religions as a means to cope with an often dangerous and indifferent world, and to peer into what Shakespeare called “The undiscovered country from whose bourn no traveler returns.” Consciously or not, three years into President Obama’s term, millions of Americans are reexamining their religious beliefs and I suspect this will play an important role in the outcome of the 2012 elections.
I think I mentioned before that I didn't even like cake until very recently. Now that I work at a cupcake shop, liking cake kind of comes naturally. But I'm still very Goldilocks about it all.
In 2011, in the preface to the 75th anniversary edition, Pat Conroy called this novel “The last Great… Victory of the Confederacy”
certainly has brought smiles to both family and friends over the past decade and a
When one can view how much hurt a tree faces, when being torn by a storm,
There is less than 10 minutes of prep time, most of which is waiting for the oil to hit 375 (no higher or they’ll burn). The actual cook time for 24 is 10-15 minutes depending on how big your frying pan is. They tend to stay warm though as you cook the rest.
Onto our December challenge and the Theme is Children. I 'm sure there are loads of you making things for Christmas Fairs that are suitable for children or even big children. Not forgetting the Christmas Cards for a child or even in my case just catching up with photos for Scrapbooking.
What would improve your county's standing ?
High School class reunions are always held during this week and it's always fun to see everyone come home. This year marked my 30th reunion!! I already know, you don't have to say it!! ;-) 30 years is a long time and that means I'm old!! :-) We had about 20 classmates show up and they all looked great. I didn't make it to the picnic, my body and health weren't cooperating!! :-( However, I did make it to the parade...
Overall, it was worth buying, even thought I'm not quite sure with other things cause there are no sizes or so...really puzzling...
4) Quarantine, Greg Egan, Legend
3. Systematically extend private education
Coinciding with increased HFCS use is a sharp rise in non-alcoholic fatty liver disease (NAFLD), which is a precursor to sclerosis of the liver.
Peru’s Deputy Minister for Natural Resource Development, Gabriel Quijandria Acosta, said a virus might have killed the dolphins.
This is going to sound crazy, but I guess you could say that I have ‘thalassaphobia.’ It’s an intense fear of the ocean. The ocean, not water- I do take showers! I don’t know why, but I have always had this intense amount of anxiety when I get near the ocean. This, my parents and I found out when we went to Daytona Beach when I was four or three years old. I won’t even touch pictures of it! My friends were wondering why I would flip my biology book pages with my pencil back in high school- it’s that bad. lol I wish I didn’t have it, because it’s so beautiful to look at! Mella was trying so hard to get me to go into the water. You can see how much I’m freaking out in the second picture… I just remember her yelling, “Just get in! Get in! It’s just water!” But the waves… Oh the waves coming in, they were just intimidating me as I pondered! I would take a step forward, but as soon as I saw them charging at me, I would take several steps back. My hands were sweating, my legs were going numb, and my heart was racing! But how exactly am I supposed to enjoy this beautiful island if I don’t take a step in? Eventually, I got there. The waves left me as soon as Mella took this shot. No worries though, there will be other pictures that will prove that I was at least able to soak my feet in the water.
Pedigo accepted those words as gospel. He has broken bones to prove it. While competing at Lake Charles, La., he stayed with a bronc that backed into a fence and fell on him breaking the cowboy’s ankle.
At 18, I reluctantly left. I worked my arse off in year 12. Two suicide attempts later, I had a scholarship for university and did a year before moving state to be with the Boy. I have very little contact with my parents and therefore, my siblings.
“We’re seeing shifts because of reality TV. We’re also seeing characters in TV shows like Hawaii Five-O and Entourage,” said Adachi. “You’re seeing those characters pop up and I think it’s a combination of things. you have talented actors, who carry with them a level of acting ability combined with star power.
My domination over nature is complete.
- Outside pocket
This spicy fried chicken is one of our favorite, and it will make you lick your fingers off!
Interviewer: Do you believe that when a Muslim wants to convert to Christianity, this constitutes freedom of belief?
I’ve yet to meet an emotion that’s been felt by someone for no reason. There’s usually always a reason, often a good one, and even it if it seems silly or trite, by recognizing what’s going on beneath the surface in such moments, we can often spare ourselves being clubbed over the head with the same message at some future point in time.
Any surprises or "Ah Ha!" moments? For those that had been waiting eons for this post, did this help a bit? Did it spark any additional kitchen organizing questions? What other tips do you have for keeping a super functional and organized kitchen space?
I had to leave him first.
Every one of you, American believers and non believers alike, the body politic, each have an enemy — a common ground. that enemy chairs what seems like an omnipotent power in your government who has been able to grip key positions in politics who control your intellectual, and spiritual lives. A power that has been able to monitor all citizens of the United States. An enemy that marries within the family to keep the wealth in the family. An enemy that Germany faced prior to world war two. An enemy who exterminated people of Middle Eastern descent to make room for an illegal nation. This enemy holds one of the top most influential lobby groups in the U.S. congress and the british parliament — eh pack: American Israel Public Affairs Committee — a lobby for a foreign nation. the ones who lock control of the wealthiest banking systems in the world, the ones who lock control of the mainstream media, the ones who elect and endorse candidates invaluable to the constitution like Mitt Romney, the ones who lock the chances of good men from earning the title President , the ones who bribe congressmen to vote on behalf of corporate interests, the ones who’ve shelved us beneath their interests, and the ones who wish to suck your idea of liberty dry.
B.) go into the Light. You very dark ones face un-creation or the Hell
Tue 10/21 San Francisco, CA Grand Ballroom
We are creatures of community and learn to rely on those around us – even strangers. This leads to the question: from whom do you get your queues?
Motown Marathon order of elimination:
Ribbon: (DS Sparkle Satin) Wrights, (green with blue polka dots, Green Solid) American Crafts.
These are the famous crop circle ‘ghosts’.
Mix together first five ingredients. Pour into pie shell.
Babies grow so fast. I recently purged Kira’s toys from all the baby items and replaced them with toys that encourage imaginative play and creative expression.
1290 **D-II/5/1998. “Shakespeare’s Bible.” Women’s Society of the Hyde Park Union Church, Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item C-1998(12), above, pp. 828-40.)
3. Bake 350°F for 40 minutes or until fork tender.
And then someone yelled “Spring Break” out of the car.
1) The EDL are now an illegal organisation
First, Laura Slattery’s Irish Times report (5 April 2012) about investigative journalism by RTÉ, the state broadcaster, contains the following line:
Prune back hard to a couple of sets of fat buds a few feet from the ground in Feb/March to keep the blooms closer to eye level, otherwise they can escape from view. Viticella and tangutica clematis as well as the herbaceous or non-twining clematis can be classed this way (Group/Type 3 or C).
Adopt open tender system
However, Antonia is an italian name and her passport is italian.
After the parade was over, we stumbled upon a ‘new to us’ snack stand and my husband discovered and fell in love with a ‘new to him’ raspberry lemonade slush. The kids also enjoyed their orange slushes. Not to be confused with orange lushes.
Gizi made the nockerli by mixing up the batter and flecking off small pieces of it from a little board, using a small paring-size knife that she would dip in water as she went along. Fleck, fleck, fleck, fleck, fleck - at a rapid-fire pace. Walter has the little board in a drawer at the farm. The first time I used it by myself, the nockerli were too big. Almost the size of gnocchi. Totally unacceptable.
Through the years Morocco has attracted large numbers of European and American writers the best known of whom is probably Paul Bowles. His most famous work, “The Sheltering Sky”, though set in Algeria, reveals both the attractions and the dangers of North Africa, a landscape and society quite ‘other’ than the west. It is beautifully written - sharply evocative of the sounds, smells and sights of North Africa. However it is a dark and rather unsettling read whose three main characters - Port a narcissistic dilettante, Kit his equally drifting wife and their companion Tunner, have little to endear them to the reader. That two of them meet horrible fates is not much of a surprise.
Just say the word ’coz I’m always there
The trial of a French journalist and novelist who sided with the Nazis ended in the only execution of a major French writer after WWII — following a six hour treason trial. A moral who-done-it about freedom of speech and the death penalty.
Overall, I am quite disappointed with the Roses Ultimes de Chanel Collection. While most of the shades are lovely, I don't think I was particularly blown away by any of the items. Chanel has released many unique, fashion-forward les vernis in previous collections and these just don't seem to be on the same level. I think most of the nail polish shades are dupable from other lines for a lower price point. At $26USD a bottle, I was expecting a lot more. As for the glossimers, Jalousie is the most opaque out of the 6.
If I was to think of a word to cover all my writing, the poetry, the stories and the novels I’d probably go with ‘chamber pieces.’ Okay, that’s two words. The road that the two brothers walk down in Milligan and Murphy is just a road. I don’t even mention that the road is in Ireland. It’s obvious where it is and why state the obvious?
I was very much awake through day 1 of the surgery. Just like that, I was being rolled into the OR. The interns, the nurses, Dr. Sadikot, et.al assembled, and they asked me: “are you sure you want to go ahead with the operation?” And in my most vulnerable moment, I smiled. And said “I asked you all to be here today, so thank you; yes, let’s do it..” The experience was surreal. I didn’t get to do much watching, but once Dr. Sadikot began the stimulation, I felt pins and needles through my entire right side! It was truly astounding; I felt pins and needles throughout my legs, which have not had much sensation since 18 months after my diagnosis, circa November 2009. He then proceeded to perform some stimulation, calling out the number of volts so that it could be recorded along with my reaction to the various settings he programmed.
Finally the police. Don’t piss off a guy who can lock you up, destroy your future and make you the idiot. These are some of the only people that you should actually NEVER say shit to. Nothing is benign with the police. If you’re in the hot-seat: Name, address, ID number, Lawyer… no more, no less.
EDIT: I was asked to do a tutorial, erm as you probably know now I'm awful at explaining things, but basically this is what I did...
I’ve been wanting to do flags that would remind us of taking care of our home, in the bigger sense, and have thought of few ideas. But what made sense this year, was to create Earth Day Prayer Flags, and I love the connection we have now with India, and having visited the foothills of the Himalayas, it makes me feel like I have a stronger connection to the original meaning of these. And though I looked for prayer flags while we were in northern India, these that we made here at home last week, will remind us of why we have them.
While some tribes would have to make fundamental changes to their court structure in order to implement longer sentences — such as using law-trained attorneys and judges rather than lay people — Standing Rock already has an advanced court system similar to state district courts.
Greetings unto this illustrious group!
That includes where Neva is going again when I pull into the driveway.
And then we went on to Chardonnay:
Hope everyone had a great weekend,I have not been feeling all that well all weekend so this is going to be short and sweet.
Higher up the flanks, where the slope angle was approaching 25 degrees the channels lost most of their sinuosity, increased the levee height, and also demonstrated a number of bifurcations – again suggesting multiple flow pulses.
OK, that is what the stuff I am trying to get rid of looks like, what about the stuff that is staying? Isn't that more important? Why, yes it is:
But with some CAMRA members there’s this sense of entitlement. It has nothing to do with head office having negotiated a commercial discount; it’s about this or that individual believing they deserve special treatment simply because they are a CAMRA member.
The earlier waves of immigrants are now becoming pensioners, each year their numbers grow, and in twenty or thirty years, those arriving now will be joining them. If you believe the crazy argument we are being fed we will then need even more new immigrants to support them., and more again after that. Given that space is finite, do we continue this lunacy until we are required to stand on each others shoulders? And what then? Is this the legacy we want to leave to our children?
compared with 3,569 and
It's good to be back!
word-count: 599
said
Let me know.
Why do you avoid making the changes you need to make to insure your success and happiness? One reason you may not have taken a hard look at how relationships affect success is that you do not want people thinking you think your better than them. It has nothing to do with the worth of a person, only the impact that the person has on you, and whether or not it is a positive one.
Dad was still, in the early sixties, a reservist in the Royal Air Force, having reached the rank of Squadron Leader. The big house where his unit was stationed was due to be sold off and the unit disbanded and, consequently, the contents of the Officer's Mess were shared out amongst Dad and his fellow officers.
resulted in the removal of most of
I'm making it a goal to use something old in each outfit, so I don't feel like I have to keep buying new stuff. The shoes are about 3 years old and the bracelets are about 2 yrs old.
Blech.
I’ll try and explain this by example.
sent from Costa Rica
Wandering around the streets comprising Gimcheon market, I find the first pair of pants that actually fits me. Probably the only pair in this city.
Lunch and dinner with traditional holiday items. brandy from Maramures, wine, beer, at the discretion included in price
The canvas is the view from her room exactly. Every leaf distinct, every spot of shadow. And so he smiles and asks what’s wrong Emma? though he knows full well what. She says you put yourself into the painting. He says I didn’t paint myself in. She says yes, but you’re still there, just there, beyond the corner? You’re crouching in the dumpster with a knife.
You ask, Gentle reader, is this the end of the tale,
I know that I've been outspoken about sharing patterns before. I know that I may have ruffled some feathers concerning the fact that I am proud of the fact that I give my patterns away for free. It's not because I somehow feel like I'm better than someone else because I do. Everyone has their own personal reasons for doing what they do. What I find irritating, both as a free pattern user and a free pattern creator, is when someone puts the stipulation that this item is for your personal use only and that you cannot sell any product made from that pattern. Here's why I don't like that. With that stipulation you are telling people that they cannot recuperate any of the costs that it took them to make it. I am all for donating. I am all for giving gifts away. Believe me, that's how all of my patterns came about. But, for me to tell you that in your private life when someone wants to purchase an item that you have the ability to create and they don't; and they want to bless you by purchasing it from you instead of just expecting you to do all that work for nothing.....and you CAN'T?? To me, that is wrong. There should be intellectual rights for a pattern, you bet. No one should be able to claim a pattern that is not theirs. And no one should be able to take a pattern and mass produce an item to create an empire out of it. But, there is no harm in someone having the ability to work a craft fair or two. Or sell to a local boutique or two. If the designer asks you not to sell in a certain place, then by all means respect that, but to say that NOTHING you make from that pattern is saleable.....yeah, well, you know what I think.
Lott is between Temple and Waco, which means it's about 45 minutes from civilization as I know it. The daily forecast is: windy, or sometimes plum blow-you-over gusty. The soil here grows some ginormous trees, and if you know anything about me at all, you know I have a ginormous affinity for thick-trunked behemoths--the ones that provide lots of shade, I'm sayin' (for all you gutter-brains).
The elision of a proper name or place with a series of dashes.
The natural conscience… Romans 2:15… “They demonstrate that God’s law is written within them, for their own consciences either accuse them or tell them they are doing what is right” (NLT). God put His law of right and wrong into the human spirit… It is part of our makeup… It is there to stay. The conscience then is a seat of judgment, which passes judgment on the morality, or immorality of our actions… By its very nature, the conscience instantly approves or condemns our acts. The conscience does not communicate fresh truth… it simply expresses judgment that your act is either right or wrong…
My favorite book is always the one that is coming to life slowly in my sketches.
Want to know what the first step is? Go ahead and follow this blog and grab the button if you'd like. It is entirely up to you if you'd like to post the button on your blog. And hey, you could even mention this ol' blog in your next post to get the word out to other Minnesota bloggers! ;-)
This power grants control of the winds in the area around the caster, allowing them control speed and direction. The strength of the winds are limited (no more than a stiff breeze) and all winds must behave in the same way. So the caster could calm winds within the entire area but not calm some parts and excite others...the entire area is affected equally. The exact limitations of the power depend on the circumstances and the decisions of the GM and player but here are some guidelines.
Supposedly the POTUS has a plan for the economy. Of course, he can't reveal it until he is done campaigning and has taken a vacation (he takes more vacations than anyone I've ever heard of).
“It’s awful,” Kassi Gilbert said of the pain inflicted by the loss. “It’s every day. It just doesn’t go away.”
Fulford’s claims and warnings to supporters of a covert global depopulation program are so startling that they could easily be dismissed as wild conjecture and neurotic conspiracy theory. There are however a number of reasons why his claims should not be simply dismissed and be considered on their merits. First, the quality of Fulford’s journalistic investigations and professional background do not indicate he is someone prone to exaggeration and making unsubstantiated claims. Many of his articles with Forbes Magazine were and continue to be essential reading for Western businessmen desiring to invest or conduct business in Japan. Second, he has interviewed people in very senior positions in Japan over the last decade including seven Prime Ministers, captains of industry, security police and leading figures in the Japanese underworld. So he does have access to the shadowy underworld figures he claims have approached him to take on the issue of a covert global depopulation program.
Put some fire up your ass.
With sweets in which I can indulge.
In such broader interpretations, I believe that one must have in mind the fact that all Albanians, regardless of their geographical and geopolitical position, or their religion, have no reserves for their belonging to the famous European code. One must look for an answer to the Albanians’ position in their political spectrum. There is no political party, or movement, which would, in any way, act against the things written in the Albanian National Awakening.
As a graduate student studying to become a Nutritional Counselor, this intrigues me because it's right up my alley. Working with clients with food addictions, over-eating disorders, or just plain trouble losing weight is what I want to do for a living. Therefore, I thought I might share some things I have learned so far that might help people approach the concept of weight loss from a different, psychological, perspective.
Their descendants had moved into a riot of discordant dreck.
Or those with Down’s will start to frown
Blogger is playing up and won't allow this post to drop from the top, but please don't enter now as your name won't be taken into account.
You have one week to claim your prize.
His favourite "subject" is still recess and lunch (where he plays soccer with his mates every single day) which is wonderful because it gives him a reason to want to be there. And this doing the homework thing in the morning is working wonders - when he is fresh and alert, when his eyes are functioning at their best and when it means his afternoons are free for more soccer and XBox. Plus I think the weekly tutoring is giving him a bit of confidence. It's all just working in his favour.
Parties are then forced to work for the people.
5/21/9:00pm – Pitched yeast at about 68˚. Managed to break my hydrometer and spill water and wort on multiple occasions.
Officers found a 2001 white van behind a 7/Eleven convenience store with two slashed tires and key marks along its left side. Also officers found near the Psychic Corner a 1993 black Toyota truck with a shattered windshield, the affidavit states.
If interested, please contact me via the contact form. I'm willing to work with Self Published and Traditional Published authors.
When I think of March, I think of the four leaf clover,
Vegetarian Option: Instead of chicken add one cake of crumbled extra-firm tofu.
Many are tortured and some undoubtedly murdered, say campaigners. A trafficked five-year-old boy from Nigeria was finally identified several weeks ago, 10 years after being killed and dumped in the River Thames. His arms and legs had been cut off and he had been disembowelled whilst still alive. Police believe the murder was linked to Nigerian “Muti” ceremonies. Twenty-one Nigerians living in south-east London were linked to the torture and murder.
I am so loving the Gabrielle line and got the urge to make a canvas with it the other day as the Aquamarine colour is perfect for home decor and of course I am just a huge fan of butterflies! I just love the Gabrielle Elegance paper and right from the first time I saw it that butterfly has been screaming at me to do something with it so of course I had to use that for my canvas! :)
Some Americans are doing their level best to drag us backward into a (New) Dark Age. They try hard to remain uneducated, driven by superstition, ignorance, and stupidity. Unfortunately, events have conspired to increase the likelihood that they will be at least partially successful. Places like Tennessee and Texas have passed laws that seriously damage their educational systems by offering support to pseudoscience such as creationism and climate change denial. With the ascension of the ultra-rich, and the consequent decrease of the fortunes of practically everyone else, the devaluation of education is already well underway.
when the little child says what
“The 22 is in the glove, and the shotty is in the trunk” she thought.
Corbett: I don’t know but it seems like there
Some first get CFS when they are in their 50s, others when teenagers.
Our beloved Phillies won the World Series in 2008 while I was at that photoshoot. There I was in my hotel room, screaming into a pillow while everyone here at home was dancing in the streets. If you look on page 100 you’ll see the sports section from the day after the big win as table protection under my artwork. (Go Phils.)
It's true. I wrote well over 100,000 words on Calling Me Home to eventually cull it down to the 103K or so submitted first to agents, then editors. And now, after months of official edits and copy edits, the current incarnation is slowly making its way through the production process toward official publication.
Do you dream of far off lands and unique cultural treasures? You might want to check out the Medina Bib Necklace, which will remind you of the amazing artisan works of Marrakesh and Fes…or another one of my fav.’s, the Jules Ring, or the stunning Capri Chandelier Earrings
More social media:
Who needs big pieces of paper...these days, just give me some fun embellishments and interesting strips of patterns and a layout will be born! I wanted a center cluster on this page and wanted to use both photos. A large mat would have been too heavy for me so I went simplier. Piecier. That is not really a word, but it works. I used many goodies from the Nook April Grab Bag. Pam offers these each month for a great price!
Tonight was going to be her finest party ever.
Nootropic-like effect of ashwagandha (Withania somnifera L.) in mice.
There was an island at Lemington Point which was locally known as 'Canary Island' during World War I because of the effect cordite had on the skins of the munitions workers. The land was reclaimed after World War II and in 1958 the Anglo Great Lakes Corporation Ltd. Built a plant for the conversion of carbon into graphite for use in the nuclear industry. This was the beginning of the Lemington Industrial Estate.
Because I teach at University, I sometimes feel like I need to be able to give an “academic” type definition well supported by theory. But to be honest, it isn’t where my interest lies. The courses I teach focus on practice. By the end of the courses, I hope students will pick up some practical skills they will be able to use in their work or other aspects of their lives.
3/4 cup walnuts, coarsely ground (See note.)
Does that seem radical?
I feel that it always takes something or someone to change your life and lead you down a greener path, and well, Ayden was the one who took my hand and did just that.
It's that time of week again for a brand new challenge here at Charisma!
Although Canyon de Chelly park responsibilities are administered by the National Park Service, the Navajo Tribal Trust Land is exclusive owners of the Navajo Nation and canyon community. To visit the floor of the canyon, you must be escorted by a park ranger or official Navajo guide. One place this regulation is not enforced is the White House Ruin Trail. Canyon de Chelly’s most unique rock formation is known as Spider Rock. This configuration is made of sandstone and is a 750 feet tall slender structure and can be seen for miles. “According to traditional Navajo beliefs the taller of the two spires is the home of the Spider Grandmother.”
448 pages
Next came the second layer of cake, brushed with more of the espresso syrup (on both sides). And then another layer of the mascarpone filling. This would be the top of the cake, so I made sure to smooth it out evenly with an offset spatula.
put a LOT of water in the pan
Along with hundreds of child porn images on Kyle’s computers, investigators found information that led them to the St Louis area, where Kyle had visited Vanvlerah four times in five months since meeting online.
I admit it. I was a total snob when this book was recommended to me. Witches and vampires? Again with the witches and vampires? No, not for me, I thought. But because this book was recommended by someone whose tastes I generally trust, I checked it out from the library to give it a try. By page two I was interested. By page six, I was hooked. Picturesque and blessedly literate, A Discovery of Witches is a fabulous summer escape. Particularly on a foggy night. (I liked it so much I bought my own copy after returning the book I read to the library.) And even better, you won’t have to wait long for the sequel. Shadow of Night is being released on July 10th!
I am ordering the parts and will repair it here at home. I am sure the cost of replacing the window at an RV Dealer would be well into the $500 range as the one I called said they weren’t repairable and the would have to replace the entire window with the fiver being tied up 3 to 5 weeks. But they really didn’t sound like they were interested in trying to get a window for a brand of trailer they don’t sell or stock any parts for.
a step into the sand
Here is my sign that spring just might – just might! - actually be arriving. Daffodils in full bloom and it’s light out at 7 in the evening. I’ll take it.
With this year being the last covered under his contract, Nathaniel was given the chance to impress Freedman during our last pre-season campaign and the most part he did just that, forcing his way into the thoughts of both the manager and supporters with some spirited performances and a very well taken goal during our home friendly against Norwich.
This morning, as I was eating breakfast, I realized I know what my dream job is. I even know where it is. In fact, if I wanted to, I could walk to and from my Dream Job’s location.
But while the process is a risky one it is something that Jung argued is a necessary one if we are to reach our full potential. For him consciousness is comprised of the ‘ego’ that aspect of us that is defined by the world we live in and and a result of experiencing everyday reality, while the unconsciousness is the domain of the ‘self’ – in Moriarty’s world the ego could perhaps be personified by the Fomorian archetype and the self by the Tuatha Dé Dannan.
“It may not be against the law to earn millions and park the results in tax havens, but it does seem rather wrong.”
This was a popular project. The kids all enjoyed painting these. Aprons were a must for this project as well.
Rio Blanco Pale Ale
1 driving
Councilmember Grimes began by assuring the panelists that the council wasn’t “afraid of looking ridiculous.” He questioned whether it was proper for a city council to take up issues of this nature, and compared the MCCRC’s NDAA/AUMF resolution effort to the story of the drunk looking for his lost car keys under the lamppost rather than where he dropped them. The idea was that since it was Congress that had made the mistake, Congress was where NDAA opponents should turn, whether by voting for better members of Congress, or by voicing opposition to them directly. Grimes cited his own Keystone XL protest as a more “proper” way of opposing a bad policy or legislation than a city council resolution.
Rather, last fall as I emptied my pots and cleaned the patio for the long winter stretch, I pulled a clump of this Creeping Jenny out of a flowerpot and threw it to the ground. Yep. That's it. I swear.
Aelfric will laugh at him, then tell the story of how he killed Caedwalla's father, incinerated him, then added him to his Sack of Ashes. A leather bag is hug from the ridge-pole of his dining hall. He always incinerates his enemies, he says, as it prevents them haunting him. With a critical Awareness check, characters can see something inside the bag wriggling. Caedwalla is incensed, but makes his Hospitality vs. Love (Family) check and so keeps his peace. His host asks the characters to leave in the morning, saying that he will give them a day's start.
Favorite male actor and why?
They are all Italian men of between 55 and 90 years of age. Some of them have allocated jobs – loud palette stacker, engine starter, belligerent foreman, engine stopper – but most just stand (or lean on walking sticks) around, sometimes entering into an argument about how slowly a car should reverse out of the block, mostly just smoking.
Fortunately, the few who came made Rockin' Brews a pretty laid-back event. As I got there late, I only had a few beers:
Beyonce may have kept her baby private and not sold pictures but you better believe that Snooki and Jessica Simpson are both looking for the payday with their new offspring. The babies don’t even have the ability to breath on thier and are already making more than any of us will see in a lifetime. There are several ways they are going to make money on their babies: Selling exclusive confirmation of the pregnancy (generous pay), selling exclusive access to their baby shower (decent pay) and selling the first baby pics (very generous pay).
- After much soul-searching and ‘back-against-the wall-stuff’ I now know I want to pursue a life of writing and creativity
And so with middle age I was shocked as I stared
It was then when all those feelings emerged in the form of fear of rejection, anger and trauma. I tried everything, but none of the healing methods worked until I decided to forgive them and forgive myself. By doing this I released all those emotions that were not from highest love. I didn’t release them because I wanted to prove how wise I was or how unaffected I was from my past, instead I released them because they were not serving my purpose anymore.
But now he dealt a blow on Gunnlaug with his sword, and cut off from him nigh all his shield; Gunnlaug smote in turn with the king’s gift; the bearserk stood shieldless before him, thinking he had the same weapon he had shown him, but Gunnlaug smote him his deathblow then and there.
Today I invite you to leave something thoughtful in your mailbox for your mail carrier. It could be a short note to say "thank you for your hard work"; it could be "I appreciate you deliverying my mail every day...thank you"; it could be leaving a Christmas cookie with a "thank you" or "Merry Christmas" with it. Whatever you decide to do, you will be brightening the day of someone during this festive season.
6. Adam Raised a Cain- Bruce Springsteen
(Drat! There goes my excuse!)
Teagan's choices were all based at the Y but she had to choose between the regular weekly theme, the cheer or dance or tumbling weeks and the special enrichment offerings for some weeks.
We also got a couple of excellent meals in Phoenix—I highly recommend Matt's Big Breakfast (which has been featured on Guy Fieri's show) and Pizzeria Bianco. You will wait an exceptionally long time at both places (the wait can run up to four hours at Pizzeria Bianco), but you will get a meal that is so worth it in both cases.
I hadn't baked in ages, and somehow wasn't even having any withdrawals this time. But yesterday, we had a lil something to celebrate and I fell prey to the husbands nagging for a chocolate cake. Like I have mentioned loads of times before, I actually don't like chocolate that much. And every time Ro bugs me for a choc cake, I bake my moms easy Beat & bake chocolate cake which takes no time and you get the desired effect.
I have always loved Maine. It is such a beautiful state to runaway to. It is simple and relaxed and it has so much to offer. The city of Portland is known for it's chefs, bakeries, and breweries and for the abundance of local resources; including organic produce, dairy products, and seafood. As you walk the streets, there are beautiful shops, farmer's markets, fish markets, bakeries, restaurants, live bands, and much much more. I plan to runaway to Maine someday! :)
5) Write a love poem. Okay, so I know this isn't easy for everyone... So if you can't write one yourself, do a search for love poems and see what you can come up with. Print it and maybe put it in a frame. I recently did a printable of 1 Corinthians 13. Although it is not a poem... It is the best definition of LOVE you will ever find!
I like how the GoogleDocs.com displays my catalog with the separate pages showing as clickable icons in the left hand sidebar. You can also search my e-catalog, zoom in or out, download it, print it, and make a copy of it. You can move from page to page via the sidebar or using the left and right arrows.
So far, my story is going surprisingly well. No major plot holes yet, although I know it's early days. I hope that I can manage to keep those pages turning over the next 26 (eek) days.
We brought yak tenderloin from Springridge Ranch and Sylvan Star's award-winning Gouda, along with musk ox, Arctic Char, Davis Strait shrimp and sea urchin - all from Nunavut. These products are only some of the foods from our nation's bounty that will be served to the Duke and Duchess of Cambridge.
You, your interest, your support and your opinion.
Rainbows to follow the clouds
For those of you unfortunate rabble who live near neither Trader Joe's nor Coffee Bean, why not jazz up your favorite mug of hot cocoa with a splash of Peppermint Schnapps? And your local grocery store is sure to carry Ghiradelli's Peppermint Squares and/or Peppermint Bark Bars. No matter where you live, there is plenty of sweet peppermint goodness to go around this time of year.
Cups: matters of the heart and emotions.
Here men are themselves choosing their wives based on looks and desires. The subtext here is that to remain "sons of God", God and goodness ought to be involved in the process of wife choosing, not simply human senses. God sent the flood shortly after this. This fault in man is serious.
Players wore the the colorful scarves while performing their pre-game warm-ups, though uniform regulations forced them to remove the headdresses before hitting the field.
The signs were all there, though, that Barack Obama was not a real leader and would be a bad president, almost from the moment he declared his candidacy. Even before, actually — Obama himself reacted to the first questions about himself as a candidate by laughing and saying “Maybe I should actually do something first.” But a lot of smart, political people saw potential, not in the man but in the brand he could be. They created an iconography and a set of slogans. They raised money. They ran and they won and he is the president.
Diane's stuff is always awesome; be sure to check it out. More photos are available on Diane's Facebook page, as well as estatesale.net.
6 oz mixture of Spinach and Arugula/Rocket leaves
Previously ensconced in the minds of the public as a throwback from the 1980’s, property exhibitions are proving increasingly popular with both investors and lifestyle buyers alike, as a level of confidence returns to the market that has not been seen since before the economic slowdown.
As you can see I have been having a play with the Vagabond....what can I say....it's ABSOLUTELY FABULOUS....no kidding folks after my bad experience with the Big Shot Express I vowed I would never have another motorised die cutter.....this one is in an entirely different league.....you can tell from the weight of the machine it is a serious piece of kit and the motor feels much more robust...you never get the impression it's struggling to feed the plates through and it is so quiet...so if you are dithering my advice would be to get one....you will LOVE IT.
Dry roast oats for 2 mins and powder it finely. Transfer to mixing bowl.
The first and only biography of Nobel Prize-winning novelist, William Golding, has just been published ($32.50, Free Press). It is a monumental piece of work by John Carey, a noted British literary critic. In 1953, Golding was a provincial school teacher whose novel, “Lord of the Flies” had been repeatedly rejected until an editor at Faber and Faber thought better of it. It would sell millions with its tale of original sin and our capacity for evil. Perhaps not surprisingly, Golding was not a particularly nice person, a depressive who regarded himself as a monster, but he was clearly a gifted novelist and for that he will be remembered. Now you can read the full story of his life. Genius is frequently not pretty.
Here they are in my humidour! The Super Allones is a Rodolfo size (54 ring gage x 180mm or 7.1"), the Supreme is an Edmundo size (52 ring gage x 135mm or 5.3"), and the B-2 is a Piramides size (52 ring gage x 156mm or 6.1")
Vineet Nayar, CEO of Indian outsourcer HCL technologies started idea of a public 360-degree feedback online, designed to hold managers accountable for correcting any professional faults their employees think they have. The first year, Nayar posted his own before asking his team and others to follow suit. And he needed to work on his time management skills said the 3.6 out of 5 the 81 managers who rated him. And everybody at HCL now knows this thanks to his public online feedback system.
I've never really thought of myself as one who 'needs to write'. I don't. I just need work. But right now, writing IS work, so, thus, I need to write.
I promise not to ever talk about things like un-Photoshopped models or stars without make-up. Honest to God. I know that it makes some people feel prettier to know that celebrities are normal too, but I don’t think that we need to discuss it. Also I think that maybe this discussion is making us dumber? And if we stopped then Kim Kardashian could get a non-image-focused skill-based job. I think she might make a good conveyancing solicitor, or tax accountant. Maybe a teacher’s aide.
Being a guy I know quite a few of these men. They talk the talk, they’re charismatic, have the tough looking tattoos and look bad, they get the women, they cheat on them multiple times, the women get hurt… it gets tiring to watch these girls fall for the same tricks over and over!
Sprouts, Sunflower — Goshen, NY (LOCAL)
This report details the costs to society as a whole in just one state. multiply this by 50% and it is not hard to see why we are broke. Our broken educational system is not just drain on us financially, it is becoming a national security issue. It was just 40 years ago that we had the highest rates of high school and college graduates in the world. We now rank at 21st. That is how far we have fallen is such a short time.
That said, there was a moment where all seemed good because this football field was named after her grandpa and that usually means that the family kicked ass at war or business or football, all cool things to kick ass on. But then Beyan starts telling stories about love and Ben had that look he gets when he’s not drunk enough to give a shit or when “you aren’t Courtney”.
Open on to Canadian addresses, no p.o boxes please.
So, when I'm at the gym I walk 4,35 miles (7 km) an hour and when I go up and down the mountain I do now the longer route and that takes me 1 hour and 40 minutes to go 6.2 miles (about 10 km).
Vermilion Boys Tennis raised their record to 8-1 overall (3-0 conference) with a win against Amherst at home on Wednesday. Chaz Hansen raised his record to 13-0 and Tim Neihart and Eddie Adkins raised their record to 11-2. The boys will take on North Ridgeville Thursday in a WSC match!!
The whole building felt more like Oxford than Ames, Iowa, with lots of high arches, flared valence lighting and windows with heavy ironwork dividing the panes.
Since this was a simple creation, I guess I will go back to my Four Ingredient Cook Books and not make this week’s cooking too complicated. Maybe we should try something that is not a dessert.
The results did not make me happy. I found more people dislike candy corn than like it.
· PERSONAL PROPERTY (personal belongings such as clothing, furniture & automobiles for homeowners and renters)
Many Bloggers have Facebook page that we can Like, and well, that’s just sharing the love. Still, it’s genuine, and for some reason I didn’t want to be associated with the Blog on Facebook, I wouldn’t. Fortunately, it hasn’t come up.
resumes his journey on his path,
- Time to deposit the mail, – I said and reached for the envelope in my pocket. It wasn’t there.
Once you have determined whether you need a cool or warm white,
“Many boomer clients are not coasting toward retirement. Many boomers still have a lot of planning and accumulation left to do to be ready at retirement age. I’m finding success in helping boomers to put their many disjoined pieces into one plan.”
i don't really want to blog until the new site is up
So as I got caught up in my own depression about the so-called reality of book publishing, I had to take a step back and realize I was back in the “accepted” view of reality. It was as if the past 10 years of my life had vanished and I was back to the old way of looking at the world. Old beliefs floated to the top of my consciousness: life is hard; you’ll never find what you’re looking for; things are never going to change; you don’t have what it takes. The list went on and on.
Enter: Jesus…
Unaware of this and not having been told by She Who Was Too Shy and Petrified To Say So, I took her to the very top of these falls. This did not augur well for the occasion; nor, I daresay, for the stepping out, which had encountered its first hurdle at the top of the Falls overlooking the deep gorge.
Mockingbird…Everybody have you heard
Meanwhile, industry insiders also say that some of the ‘planned’ remakes are nothing but publicity stunts to either attract Bollywood producers, especially if the film was released some time back, or in the case of upcoming films, to keep film in the public eye. For instance, after its release, there were reports on Samuthrakani’s earlier film Nadodigal being made in Hindi but there has been no progress on that so far. So, does announcing a Hindi remake a way of creating publicity for films? “Not at all,” says Samuthrakani, “I don’t need to create publicity for my film through such gimmicks as there is already a lot of talk about the film,” he says and adds, “I sold the Hindi remake rights of Nadodigal to a popular Bollywood director but due to some issues, he has stalled the project for the time being. It is one reason why I have been clear in wanting to direct Poraali myself.”
And now I'm the sad and lonely one, lonely
Desperately need shoe advice. Desperately.
I've been working on several sewing projects and some craft projects for the nursery. I just got a new camera for when the baby comes, so when I figure out how to upload the pictures onto the computer I'll be sure to post. Until then, thank you for reading this blog post up to this point. Sorry if it was boring, but I'm glad to have gotten everything down I've been thinking.
driving them off with well-placed blows and shouts,
Power Inverters and Battery Chargers From Xantrex
White Boyfriend shirt - £24.99 in ASOS
We got to see our sweet little love once again yesterday. It had only been two weeks since the last ultrasound, but it's never soon enough to see that tiny miracle.
Someone ought to figure out how to harness all that wasted energy.
If there is a sequel to this book, I would definitely be really interested in reading it!
7. These ads are obnoxious - your bum is obnoxious and you’re a bum face and I hate you and your bum smells of poo.
But yesterday, I was fortunate to have one of those rare parenting paydays that's even more valuable than money in the bank.
on sorrowing men
My sisters oldest started her treatment for cancer this week the shots and the radioactive iodine. She is so strong that you would not know that she has gone through all this in the last few months... She is a great mom and a good wife. She has even opened her own hair salon in the last few months talk about keeping busy... YGG
We put her down because we knew there was no hope for her, and she was in pain. Her condition was only going to get worse. However, we really didn't know what was wrong with her. And so, after she passed away, we performed an autopsy to determine what happened, so maybe we could prevent this from happening to other chickens. It was very interesting.
In the Pacific theatre of World War II, the untold story of B-24s is told in Finish Forty and Home by Phil Scearce ($24.95, University of North Texas Press). In the early years of WWII in the Pacific, against overwhelming odds, young American airmen flew the longest and most perilous bombing missions of the war, often facing Japanese fighters without fighter escort, relentless anti-aircraft fire, and all while covering thousands of miles over water with no alternative landing sites. Scearce tells the true story of the men and missions of the 11th Bombardment Group as it fought alone and unheralded in the South Central Pacific. It is an homage to his father, Sgt. Herman Scearce who, at age 16, lied about his age to join the Army Air Corps. This book takes you back to a time when Americans were more engaged in the war in Europe, before the island campaigns that brought our Pacific force closer to Japan and the ultimate end of the war. The bombardment of Wake Island, Tarawa, and finally Iwo Jima made that possible. It took great courage and the 42nd Squadron lost nearly half its men through 1943. Another chapter in the Pacific is told by Joseph A. Springer in Inferno: The Life and Death Struggle of the USS Franklin in World War II (19.95, Zenith Press, softcover). On March 19, 1945, off the coast of Japan, the USS Franklin had just launched its aircraft for an attack on the shipping industry in Kobe Harbor. A single enemy aircraft came out of the cloud cover and, in a matter of second, its bomb would strike the Franklin, setting off a chain reaction of exploding ordnance and aviation fuel. More than a thousand died or were wounded. Listing heavily to starboard, it seemed the great ship was doomed, but the remaining crew of Big Ben, officers and enlisted men, volunteers to remain on board to save the ship as the USS Santa Fe came along side to rescue the wounded and nonessential personnel. The ship made an arduous journey from Okinawa to the Brooklyn Navy Yard in a great story of endurance and seamanship for a great chapter in the history of the U.S. Navy.
(small, medium and large making these unisex socks and something mom, dad and their kids would all want to wear together for some happy family socksy fun)
A Sunday Times investigation has found the use of these pay deals is widespread across government. In some cases companies can be used to reduce a personal tax bill to 2% a year compared with up to 50% if the individual were on the government payroll. The companies must also pay corporation tax, but the overall tax bill would still be about half that paid by a salaried employee.
The hand lives on, however, in the name of what is essentially the new, unofficial brewery tap, Afspanning De Hand. Afspanning is another Flemish word for café, literally meaning relaxation (where you can get restored as in a restaurant). The focus is indeed on food. All the De Koninck brews and no others are available- which makes a selection of five beers, including the seasonal Winterkoninck.
I joked to Pat that I should give up writing blogs about farts and shit and start name-dropping celebrities instead. “Don’t do it,” she said. And then she said something sobering. “I’ve got one word for you: Snooki.”
Knitting Circle
3 lbs boneless, skinless chicken breast
Bangladesh is the world’s true phenom. Its Tau Index is off the chart, literally. I had designed a place called “Perfect Land,” that had a high income, moderate cost of living, abundant IT expenditures, and great income distribution. I figured nobody could beat Perfect Land, but Bangladesh soared more than 40% above it. I had seen in some recent presentations at conferences that there was something stirring in Bangladesh. The Tau Index reflects that. I am working to follow up with some folks in that country to see what’s going on. Bangladesh spends 9.2% of its GDP on IT, or 23.8% on an adjusted basis. It has a low cost of living and a strongly equitable distribution of income.
Salka Valka is a milestone in Laxness' career but people do not agree as to whether it is his last juvenile novel or his first mature one. The very interesting thing about the novel is that it started out as a manuscript for a motion picture, written in Los Angeles, and it so happens that this manuscript was printed for the first time this year (2004), both in English and Icelandic, in the literary magazine Tímarit Mals og menningar. Halldór Laxness went to L.A. in 1927, determined to become a scriptwriter in Hollywood."The film life here is magnificently interesting and I have good hopes to get into that as soon as I have written something in English... "he writes to his fiancée in Iceland. He wanted Greta Garbo to play the main character in the film which was to be called Salka Valka, a Woman in Pants or The Icelandic Whip! Unfortunately it all came to nothing.
The Stephen Lawrence murder investigation should formally have been a “B” category investigation. This is one “where the victim is known but the motive and suspect are unknown” (para, 32.8).
Liz Miller xx
The end results are impressive. And very Chorlton.
Reading the poems, have made me think of those dolmens, that I have not seen now, for many years.
@Naomi_Hunter Fill your writing with love.
For a second it seemed it was coming for me, but that wasn’t right. But it was comes for something, with a vengeance. The pain reminds me again it is a threat.
I,ve had a major attack of lassitude today. I wasnt going to post this weekend.Partly because I havnt really yet got around to visiting others who posted+commented on Theme Thursday.I'm sorry for being such a lazy bugger.
Dr Kraushaar also told the court that the 22-year-old was so afraid of being rejected by others that she also allowed Kyle to choke, burn and urinate on her.
Last November I decided that I would start taking burlesque lessons. I decided that I would have one-to-one lessons rather than join a class. After having taught me the basics, M, my teacher who is simply amazing, and I began working on a routine. In April this year after a couple of prompts I joined her intermediate class. Last Monday I finally put all that hard work together and performed my routine in front of a few friends in Bristol.
So much to do.....and I had to go back to the place I had my oil change to have them reset my maintenance light! I sure miss Jennifer (Jeni) and Lavin cars. This is the second time I had to do this....
the point of his running the risk of reminding his compatriots of some
Anyway, The Tomboy will not ever never go for a wee. In the way that a camel can store water, The Tomboy can store wee for days and days. Just in case she is stranded in a desert and needs an emergency drink perhaps. Apparently the kidneys of the camel are very efficient at retaining water too and urine comes out gloopy. Which is interesting because when The Tomboy does eventually do a wee, it resembles a thick syrup.
Surprising, right?
1½ cups red wine
My desire to homeschool my children is one that I've needed to defend often throughout the years. But this year, the year that my oldest became a fifth grader, I have had to defend it like no other.
Which, by all means, denies the ethics inherent to its kin
Deceit by Brandilyn Collins starts out good and gets better and better as it goes! Baxter Jackson, a widower who lost both his wives in "accidents," is highly respected and a great guy in the community with some dark secrets.
He stumbles to the gnarled grey trunk,
holds up to earth a sky wide open,
First up, one of Yellow Rose's 6oz Tureen Candles I was sent a double layer candle with Cinnamon on the top and Hot Cocoa on the bottom. I really love it. It has a strong Scent throw without being over powering and is burning slowly. I want to mention too that I don't normally care for the scent of Cinnamon in candles because I find that they normally smell more like cinnamon chewing gum than a cinnamon stick. Yellow Rose's cinnamon scent smells like the real thing and when the cinnamon and hot cocoa started to mix it smelled like heaven. The Tureen candles can be purchased in 6oz ($6.50), 8oz($8.00), and 11oz($10.50). They are made with 100% Soy wax and lead free wicks and there are 55 scents to choose from.
That said, robo-Jason is horrible. Robo-Jason is proof that not everything needs an upgrade. You can keep your 3D, Facebook timeline and your hashtags; I prefer my Jason to be all smelly and raggedy. It's fortunate that his transformation to stupid glittery space robot is only for the last 20 minutes of the film. Although it does allow me to imagine an alternate ending where his remains crash near a small squad of Cybermen and he rises to become king. King robo-Jason of the Cybermen. After lopping Amy and Rory to bits, Jason kills The Doctor with his own bowtie (repeatedly, until he can't regenerate anymore) and steals the TARDIS. He takes it back to the inception of the Earth whereupon he and his Cybermen become overlords of Crystal Lake; always and forever. Just a little idea of mine. Feel free to use that, New Line Cinema and Steven Moffat.
rather exclusive Fairlight. Nowadays samplers are cheap and
When I first showed them to my husband, he said, "Oh, I could probably sell these on ebay to someone restoring an old truck" (His is finally finished after 15 years!), but I'm sure the crestfallen look on my face made him quickly say, "but you can have them if you want them." You bet I do!
A quiet night at home after an extremely busy weekend.
There might be a larger problem if you check the breaker box and the switch is already in an “off” position. Unplug all the appliances first then turn “on” the switch and if it immediately goes back to “off”; the problem most likely lies in the wiring.
I know it's everybody sin
My husband is flying back home tonight from NJ and will be landing at midnight here in FL. Our daughters Ju Ju and Soapy think that they will pick their daddy up at the airport tomorrow morning (Thursday), and they have no idea that he's planning to crawl into their beds...
A lot of style bloggers seem to have husbands and friends with photography skills that are willing to help them out with outfit posts. I can just imagine Damon's complete put-upon disinterest. Self-portraits, gorilla-pod work and Emberly shots are probably the best I'm ever going to get. Maybe I'd feel more strongly about that if I'd had better? I don't know... but I'm kind of sad that a blogger I've been followed for a while thinks she'll quit since she no longer has a reliable photographer.
For scores of people with autism, the iPad has changed a lot that is fundamental. Autism parents came out in droves after news of Jobs’ death was announced to tell stories of how much Apple technology created under his leadership has changed the lives of their children.
Accessories: satin ribbon, pearls
Check for salt, add if required, give one final stir and take it off the flame.
We had to go into a gigantic warehouse and wait while dudes brought out everyone's luggage. Then we waited in large groups to be herded to the next location. When I found my bag I immediately hauled it as far away as I could and sat on it with my head ripping apart. People still came near. I'd see noses wrinkling, people looking around in dismay for the source of that ripe stench.
D. Miller says:
Then comes more coffee and dessert, and more good conversation with more laughter thrown in - good stories and sharing, and more wine or de-caf at that point.
Remember that in past history other governments have tried to force Christians to huddle and hide only within the confines of their churches like the first disciples locked up in the Upper Room.
The next time you’re tempted to take all the credit for yourself; to not acknowledge all of the loyal, dedicated, hardworking people who helped you reach your goals; to not pay a fair wage to those who continue to allow you to realize your dreams, just remember:
The party stepped quietly back from the secret door, which they left cracked open a tiny bit while Jeremy peered through to alert them if any of the men at the table should happen to come there way, or doing anything else. They went a ways back up the dark corridor and started whispering furiously about what to do next. Hermel was uneasy about the idea of barging in on the men, primarily because he had realized that they actually had very little evidence to suggest that the men of the Five Crows Tavern, nor Doctor Lobe had actually done anything all that out of the ordinary or all that illegal thus far. After all, he pointed out in a hoarse whisper, the Hagglemsiths had trespassed into the basement. The fact they were tied up… well, he said, if he discovered tresspassers on his property he would very well do the same.
Not surviving. Not making it through.
This is the front door. Can you imagine the climbing roses surrounding it, climbing the walls. And can you see the portal that we built framing it to make it look absolutely perfect? I want lace curtains in the window and a wooden Welcome sign on the door. Swedish style with Dala horses and kurbits painted on it.
Tools: Big Shot, dots EF, circle punch, dimensionals
Both of them were riding as hard as they could. Both of them were fit and doing training rides. Both of them had fast, workable bikes.
Matthew is the absolute opposite of Dondi; if Dondi is the sun, he is the moon. “A mystery like a dark corner, or the far side of the moon,” it isn’t easy to tell what he’s thinking or how he feels about Thomas’ sudden appearance in hi s life. Quieter, less sure of himself than Dondi, he’s desperately in love with Thomas but unsure of Thomas’ relationship with Dondi, unsure Thomas even thinks of him that way he doesn’t confess his feelings. It’s this very reticence, this mystery, that captivates Thomas who is equally enamored of his former lover’s brother. Matthew is calm, loyal, a one man man, just the sort of man Thomas needs. To Thomas’s surprise he replaces Dondi in his heart.
415-255-0610
You’ll learn all about the wonderful elixir from Salisbury, NC, Cheerwine!
After 2 weeks and 14 phone calls relaying all of our indiscretions for that time period, my dad would return home and he would return home very angry. I am sure that he felt disappointed that we were supposedly running riot and taking advantage of the fact that he was not there to back up my mother when it came to disciplinary measures. Frustration obviously played a part in fuelling his temper, frustration at not being able to assist my mother from a distance and of course the guilt that she laid on thick every night at him not being home.
There is only one big risk you should avoid at all costs,
We're pleased to see the giants toppled, we tell ourselves. The little people overwhelming the all-powerful, tweeting them to death. But they're not naturally powerful; we made the media powerful. We lapped up their stories of indiscretions, paid good money for them to go through our bins.
After hearing all that Ra had said, Oset told him, “The poison continues to run through your body because you have not reveal your true name, my Lord.” Finally having no other choice Ra conceded and he led Oset into another room so that no one else could hear them. When they were alone. Ra caused his name to pass from within him and into Oset, which she used to drive the poison out of Ra’s body. The story ends with the impression that the name was not revealed, but the story was a riddle because the name was revealed to Oset in secret. To understand the story, the word for secret and hidden is “Amun or Amen,” which also means to conceal (this is the reason the word was borrowed and used to follow the end of Jewish, Christian and Islamic prayers).
21. Try 6 new fruits
Years later, having firmly established his throne, David faces yet another threat to his power in Israel, but this time the threat comes from within his own family. David’s son Absalom, having mounted a long-term public relations campaign and garnered much of the popular support of Israel, has himself proclaimed king at Hebron (2 Samuel 15:10). Again, the kingship promised to David by God seems at risk; again, David is opposed by the son of a king; again, the threat is removed through the violent death of his adversary. This time, however, the insurgent is David’s own son; this time, he has specifically ordered that he not be killed (2 Samuel 18:5); this time, the one dealing the fatal blow is David’s trusted army commander, Joab.
1 difference
But, for smart investors, there is more than just hope. As history has shown us, where there is fear, there is also profit.
One of the key principles in leading a more fulfilling life is to pursue an abundant mindset. Most people live in a scarcity mindset, they feel that there is not enough for everyone and because they do not think they have a chance of obtaining their wants and/or desires, they just give up.
Ecco il cestino visto dall'alto!! Per il bouquet ho usato alcuni fiori della Wild Orchid Craft e sopra un pochino di Stickles!!
Alas the thief. Alas the theft.
Was hard for Jack to let go.
The triple repetition of “just like we have” made me very uncomfortable. Rucks was deliberately undermining his previous words – if they’re just “beasts” then why are you saying they’re so much like us? – and it made me really consider who’s the real villain here. Just who will really be better off once the Bastion is complete? Is Rucks’ smooth, grandfatherly voice actually steering us to our doom? Those were just some of the questions I began to ask myself, but I’m going to leave it there for fear of spoiling the rest of the game.
made bread, ate my fill, and enjoyed it ( fear of being fat),
However, I don't sense that respect in the New York Times article (not that I'm terribly surprised). Having already made the sly, carefully planted suggestion that the police may have had ulterior motives for pulling the suspect (a black man, Lovelle Mixon, pictured above) over, it continues:
Of course, the spectre of Harry Redknapp will endure, a Banquo’s ghost to stalk his darker moments: at Wembley, mention of Redknapp’s name was swatted from the room by Bernstein with a flourish that suggested somebody had just broken wind. “He has been gracious in everything he has done. I hope it won’t effect our friendship,” was Hodgson’s gallant response, raising at the tail-end of a sure-footed debut the spectre of his own gentle charm.
By all means, storm on busters. Brainstorm ‘til your brains Explode. Kindly brainstorm yourselves out of existence ‘cause you can’t have a sustainable world run by corporations no matter what color they are painted in, green, blue or any shade of fecal brown.
(As I glance upward out of this page studying you, dear friend,
Ugh...somewhat, but definitely not like in previous weeks! I have upped my number of push-ups due to the challenge and my plank time is getting longer...so that was an accomplishment! (But honestly, now that I look at it...I worked out 4 out of 7 days this past week...I need to give myself more credit!)
At least my friends make regular trips into Malaysia,
CRIPPLED BY CORRUPTION
we could live like that, no?
We are going to start a new segment on this website showing the absurdities of processed foods. it is going to be called Signs of the Food Apocalypse. It will showcase the absurd processed foods that are the beginning of the end of all real food as we know it.
oh, so pretty isn't it?
LT
This is a very lovely 18th century French chest, that is not a steal in the $3,000.00 range, but a fair price. While we are training our eye, this dealer had some really unusual French and English chairs.
In fact the only disco dancing moves performed en route to London were my attempts to clamber back into row 73 of the plane – for those of you who have never strayed far from the pointy end of the plane on a 747– I should put Row 73 into context – basically if you’ve ever watched movies of parachutists jumping out of the backs of planes, Row 73 is at the pull ripcord, point of no return, moment.
Green Flash Hop Head Red; Vista, California, Amber Ale, 6.4% abv
Apple recently ramped up stricter security measures for iTunes and iOS users in an attempt to prevent accounts from being abused or compromised. Beyond just entering a password, some users are now being asked to choose three security questions and a backup e-mail address when they try to download content.
May we suggest you attend our all day (12-6 pm) Holiday Shopping Party and solve your shopping problem while drinking grog and listening to unusual, offbeat and peculiar holiday music.
This post will remain at the top until May 10th! Please scroll down to see our latest posts.
“Then he loads me in his pickup and we drove around trying to find a hospital. Finally, we found a veterinarian who sewed me up…
And today's question?--What would you contribute to a post-apocalyptic world???
Think about it. It is not an every day occurrence, and most of us would be terrified at the thought of being in the presence of God. Yet, isn’t that what we claim we want when we accept Jesus as our Savior? There is nothing to be afraid of. There is only grace and mercy at the cross of Jesus!
I guess the pivotal moment in my career was making a mixtape, which was mostly grime and getting lots of artists like Plan B, Professor Green, Sweetie Irie, Curtis Lynch and Wiley on there. Being the only female in a male-dominated scene at the time, I went about selling my own CDs, whilst pushing it to radio stations and my first video ‘Fire’, pretty much placed me on the map. And from there I’ve featured on various albums and even toured with N-Dubz last year.
Place the loaves into the oven for 35 to 40 minutes. The loaves should be done when tapping them your finger sounds hollow. Remove bread from the oven and place on bakers wracks to cool. If making loaves, remove from the pans to cool.
in the relapsing rapture
3 studied
Aperos can go on for quite a long time and are always generous (none of your stingy English pub measures), so by the time everyone sits down to eat, everyone is more than merry.
So off they went to get their little paper done. After a little while, one of my little ducklings brought his paper to me and explained in no uncertain terms that he was done. I took a quick look and reminded him about the coloring.
Secondly, I’ve joined the library.
- The Tigers are not hitting, but there reasons for it. They are not taking opposing pitchers deep into the count. Today they had very quality at bats early in the game. They made it easy in Royals' starter Jonathan Sanchez.
4. ALWAYS leave at least 6 inches of yarn. When I first started crocheting I left sometimes only an inch or so of yarn after I was done with a project and I was always so disappointed when my project came unraveled so easily. It was a lesson that was learned the hard way but I'm so glad I did learn. It's saved me a lot of grief.
Utter and complete madness presided over by Corin ‘Parker Lewis, I Know My First Name Is Steven, Jonas Quinn’ Nemec. I think if I had sharks that were not just angry or a wee bit miffed but actually raging then I’d send in Parker Lewis, he can’t lose apparently. Raging Sharks is one of those movies where it’s best to start drinking earlier, you may then find that as Parker Lewis negotiates his way through sharks, aliens, spaceships, treacherous assassins, nuclear submarines, cosmic crystals, Corbin Bernsen and some footage from Shark Attack 3: Megalodon that you actually start to enjoy yourself in the midst of the stupidity.
The Bride is able to follow
yin yang energy or chi
8) Players can dribble and take a max of three steps before passing or shooting.
Today, in the midst of Paris Fashion Week, the W Opera Hotel - the brand new branch of the global W hotel brand - opened in Paris. Set in a Haussmannian building overlooking the gilded Palais Garnier opera house, the hotel boasts 191 rooms including 20 suites and two Extreme Wow Suites (that's W language for seriously swanky presidential suites).
Seeking a Scribe: Enchanted Bookstore Legend One
Mrs Grisbrooke - I never knew her first name. But she had a huge oblong topaz ring, too big for her finger, which she used to twirl round it and play with while she spoke to us. (Her engagement ring?). Although she had a lovely noble, rather Roman face, her figure was a bit lumpy. I remember overhearing a mother asking her one parents' evening, "When's the baby due?"
There were many people I met at my placement and a lot were from Coventry University, So for all of them, I will definitely be keeping in contact with them as friends and they can also help me develop my practice through different skills. I met a lot of graphic designers and media production students who could really help me develop as a business by helping me build a decent website and by also widening my skills by developing more work in film and video.
THE SCORCH TRIALS
“That car looks familiar,” said Chris.
- waking up not knowing what day of the week or even month it is.
Pre-Workout Fuel
Psalm 139:16
Well I had to write something for the big 200 day mark! There isn't much to update, or at least not anything good...
This next bit involved 2 days and much huffing and puffing and tea drinking ! I put my newly filled wall into place and arranged the shop shelves
The two preschool boys we were with were up for the Tim Burton-ness even though their parents and grandmothers were not so sure it was a good idea. There was some fretting among the adults that it might be too scary. However, the little fellas both thought Wednesday was about the coolest person on the whole dang planet and, if she thought it was awesome, well, heck, then it must be!
Knowing Maggie, I’m sure she is embarrassed by the accolades.
This is a holder for a restaurant gift card. I don't think I could have found a better stamp for this purpose. I wish someone would fill it up for me! lol
“you can’t have your parcel without a docket”
The embossing background was made using a Sizzix folder (luv how deep they emboss). The lace detail is a punch by Martha. Oh I almost forgot..the ribbon….colored with copics! I told you I was a coloring fool! LOL
2 weeks after Christmas.
See? I have a dangler. It bugged all day. What are you supposed to do with the extra belt you got hangin'? I tried clipping it shut with bobby pins. But I looked especially uncool. Too obvious.
I’ve heard people say that “you have to take care of yourself before you can take care of someone else”. That may be true to some degree, but what if when we were feeling down or crappy or in need of “me time” we refocused and did something for our spouse? What if our efforts to take care of them first was reciprocated and they, in turn, did something for us? How awesome would it be if “me time” turned into “we time” and we could do things for each other, together? I admit I am totally guilty of putting myself first far too often, but I think I’ll try harder to purposefully do something for Dave first and then see what happens. Care to join me?
One of our Facebook friends charged that Chukerman is an ex-gay porn star. We guess it is all in the eye of the beholder. The former actor was in a few racy movies, that’s true. According to his IMDB profile, he had roles in “Boys To Men,” “Eating Out 2: Sloppy Seconds,” “Evil Bong II: King Bong” and “The Curiosity of Chance.”
We seemed to prefer villains to heroes and shady characters to upright ones. Perhaps we were Emos before our time?
What I attempt to do below is analyse EU direction on this basis.
We toughed it out at home that first night. The house was still warm and we were able to keep G entertained after dark by using a few jar candles and a few strategically placed head lamps (hung from wall frames, ceiling fans, etc.). The gear of a bridge climbing husband is very handy in a power emergency. By morning, the house was measuring 65 degrees. We all packed up and went out once again. This time though, the roads were clear, there was bright sunshine and the snow was already melting away. An odd contrast against the green leaves and grass! That night, knowing the temps would drop off further, we took our relatives across town up on the offer of staying at their fully powered home.
The last performers.. Partyraiser vs Nosferatu. 2 of my all-time heroes. Was I dreaming? If I was.. They woke me the f*ck up because Partyraiser doesn’t know the word relax.. Nosferatu with his insomnia doesn’t know it either so we had no choice but to give everything we had left in this final hour. They don’t care if it’s late.. They don’t care if you are tired.. All they want to do is f*ck you up and they did! But we loved every second of it! I can’t wait to see them again soon and I can’t wait for Black 2013!
Crystal at My Reading Room is hosting this challenge: "I want a picture of books - show me a book shelf, your tbr pile, your nightstand piled with books, your prized ARCs, whatever, just post a picture of some books ..."
Goat cheese crumble topping
One photographer friend told me that he came out and talked about his battle with anxiety in an interview for a blog. Sadly, he actually lost work because of the blog post and had it taken down. Should I fear the same stigmatization?
“Who can turn the world on with her smile?
Surely the UN doesn’t expect the world to believe rebels are picking their bomb-making materials and Kalashnikovs from Syria’s cypress trees – and knows full well such weapons, training, and cash are flowing over the borders, admittedly from the US-led “Friends of Syria” cadre to support what is now clearly a terrorist campaign in direct violation of the UN’s own “peace deal.”
“The rationale has always been that the police is notified of a problem and they show up to keep the peace and intervene to maintain law and order by arresting culprits and perpetrators of crime. But that is conditional on the fact that there actually exists a crime, or a potential threat of one, that is worth reporting. Any other attempt to get the police involved otherwise, is a waste of taxpayers’ money and an unnecessary strain on resources.”
Spokesman for the Special Unit for Acceleration of Development in Papua and West Papua (UP4B) Amiruddin Al Rahab has said the unit will make sure that all programs in Papua are properly monitored and answer the people’s need.
Style: Trip Hop, Dub, Drum n Bass, Ambient
Here are a few subtle or not-so-subtle differences about the Aussie lifestyle to an American visitor (all images are iPhone photos from my AnneRuthmann Instagram feed):
The Socialist triumph, in a two-man runoff vote, was put at about 52 to 48 percent by several usually reliable polls. Sarkozy conceded defeat Sunday evening, and said he had called Hollande to wish him luck.
BUT - - - my patience with it is getting really thin. I think from now on, if I see this nasty little piece of work I will just trundle along, leaving that blog commentless, without even ATTEMPTING a comment.
Imagine being Washington Capitals' defenseman Karl Alzner Wednesday night. Imagine, say, that you played 37:14, over 11 minutes more than your previous career-high, in a 2-1 triple-overtime loss to the New York Rangers -- that you were one of the players in a game that beat pretty much everyone to a bloody pulp and took 114:41 to decide, nearly twice as long as it was supposed to.
Life hasn't slowed down on the farm since our hectic "hay day" a couple of weeks ago. In fact, it's done just the opposite. We've come to the point in the year when our nerves, our patience, and our equipment is pushed to the limit. That's right...we're smack-dab in the middle of harvest.
We’ve lived in this house for a year and a half. A few months after we moved in this lady moved in next door to us. I’ve had issues with her since last summer. First she cut down the trees in the front yard. Fine, that’s her right but they were such beautiful trees, they blocked the sun from the front of our house (where the kids’ bedrooms are) and they were great for climbing. Oh, but she banned the kids from climbing first because, you know, they might fall and get hurt.
So some days are good. And then, often without warning, some days are bad. Today hit me like a truck. One minute I was walking through a store, and the next I'd caught sight of myself in a mirror and couldn't handle the ugliness, the hideousness I saw there. I was mortified. I didn't want people's eyes to fall upon my self-indicting repulsiveness.
*Last but never least, Jo continues to be an absolute delight. At two, he is talking and singing and climbing and doing gymnastics all over the place. Here's a quick look:
Seeker of truth and wisdom. You could have seen your future lives. Others perceived you as an idealist illuminating path to future. The lesson that your last past life brought to your present incarnation:
Not to mention when I'm on the phone I have a bad habit of taking my larger earrings out and putting them in some nook and cranny.
that we are not sheep.
How did barre n9ne start? By being in the dance and fitness industry for as long as I have, my goal was to create a method that combined all the exercises I loved and felt were the most effective. barre n9ne® includes elements from Pilates, ballet, yoga, and certain “typical” aerobic classes. I wanted to create a method that was low impact and that would lean out the overused muscles in the body- i.e biceps, thighs/quads and focused on toning and stretching the underused/tight muscles i.e triceps, lower abs, hip flexors. Since I am originally from Danvers, I had been primarily looking there to open a studio. In 2010 I found the perfect space in to start barre n9ne® and I’m so happy I did!
I'll give up there. The hypocrisy and blindness of the rabid left with its multicultural PC zealots really does leave a bitter taste.
We have completed really hard operate to offer you with remarkable information and facts on Timex Men’s T2H291 Easy Reader Black Leather Strap Gold-Tone Case Watch, so think 100 % free to appearance close to our online site.
Overall it was a great race for a great cause. Race results were even better. I ended up getting third in my age group and received a $10 Active Runner gift card, awesome!
The year and month, Dec. 4 2007. Newspapers noted that a big storm downed the power grid and the highway was closed for a couple of days. Yes, those happened too.
And it is killing my creative mojo.
of the departure of the ancient host.
- We'll gradually be winding down the aggregation activities. No new blogs will be accepted anymore.
Potential Insights: Shows if fitness, nutrition, diet and a generally healthy lifestyle are still part of their lives. Maybe TM encouraged a sportier, fitter, more disciplined lifestyle over all.
The Modern Art of Chinese Cooking is to me the "bible" of Chinese cooking, written, surprisingly, by an American, Barbara Tropp. It is an in-depth, scholarly tome that is fascinating to read and eminently usable if you want to get into Chinese cooking in a serious way. It's a lot of fun to compile a list of basic ingredients suggested here and head to Chinatown with two shoppping bags, which will be full of interesting stuff as you head home.
“Today I will once more be a prophet. If the international Jewish financiers, inside and outside Europe, succeed in plunging the nations once more into a world war, then the result will not be the Bolshevisation of the earth, and thus the victory of Jewry, but the annihilation of the Jewish race in Europe!”
Lee Ann wrote:
Fish and chips later, so hot they burnt my tongue, bringing much needed warmth and energy back.
*Dedicated to all the LMFs I know (you’ll probably read this, see you next year).
As I have set out at great length elsewhere, the primary aim for most Leftist activists and intellectuals (though not for most Leftist followers) is to get acclaim for themselves. That is a perfectly normal human motivation but one that is pursued by Leftists more or less to the exclusion of all else. But how do you get acclaim? The surest way by far is to adopt as one's own whatever it is that the population already acclaims and become a great champion of that. If people generally think it is unquestionable that blacks and Jews are inferior and need to be kept down then a Leftist will become a vigorous advocate of keeping blacks and Jews down. And Leftists did just that in the early 20th century. Up until World War II Harvard had an excellent relationship with the Hitler regime, for instance and Hitler in turn took American eugenic policies as a model for his own. But if certain world horrors take place (WWII) which cause people to change their views and see tolerance is a virtue above all else then Leftists will immediately become great preachers of tolerance. And that too has now happened.
How I longed for so many years to see again God’s gathering, freely led by the Holy Spirit rather than by human domination.
"Beware of the beautiful stranger"
“The decision to reject this pipeline comes from the opposition of the many Indigenous communities and our allies. The Mother Earth Accord outlined the serious implications the pipeline would’ve had on the people, our rights and our lands. This is a major victory for Indigenous communities across Turtle Island. We hope the Canadian government recognizes Obama’s rejection as a sign to slow down the current pace of development in the tar sands. Rapid expansion in the tar sands has left developers struggling for inexpensive ways to ship, refine and sell their oil. Stopping these massive pipelines is key to stopping further destruction of our territory. We are still working to oppose Shell’s proposed tar sands expansion of open pit mining projects in our traditional territory in Northern Alberta. We hope that you all join the Athabasca Chipewyan First Nation this year in opposing Shell’s projects and the development of the Northern Gateway Pipeline. Together we can protect our lands, our futures and our treaty rights.”
I recognize what it feels like to be alone in a class and discriminated against because of it. I was bullied mercilessly in Jr. High School. I have experienced discrimination as a woman, because of my weight, and in relationship to my special needs child. I have had nasty and rude comments directed at me because of all of those things. I have also traveled enough to have experienced being the only white, only tall, only large female person in a culture where I didn’t have either the language or the cultural background to really get by. And I have been treated in such cultures as “not quite civilized.” I’ve been excluded from groups I could have contributed to simply because I didn’t have the appropriate credentials, regardless of my experience.
1 classification
This is the wall I want to paint teal (see this post for info on the paint swatches on the wall). I want to create some storage space where the desk currently is, and I want to move the work space further along the wall. I'll paint the other three walls in this room white to provide some nice contrast against the teal and to keep the room from feeling too dark.
3: 11:15-11:20
Well, this is it for me for today! I have a baby shower to go to today and go and do my Thanksgiving shopping. Thanks so much for stopping by to visit me, I love reading your comments.
The word
In the old days, my parents bought a couple of movies, but they were fairly expensive. We had hundreds of EP VHS tapes with movies recorded off TV, though. Sure, they were generally cut or time compressed and sometimes had a ticker on the bottom with weather alerts. If you didn’t want them to have commercials, you had to sit there while it was recording and pause and unpause the recording, which was easy to mess up and miss part of the movie. Also, they looked considerably worse than television broadcasts, which didn’t look so great to begin with since we had a rabbit-ear antenna and lived on low ground. However, you could fit about three movies on a tape that cost about two dollars. The main difficulty was storage.
I love that such a tiny little bite sized something is such a powerhouse of healthy nutrients, vitamins, minerals, they taste good, and help fill you up. To me they are the perfect snack.
This criterion may be met by submitting reference letters from a diverse group of recognized experts in the field of the foreign national’s “exceptional ability.” The letters should discuss both the foreign national’s accomplishments and where those accomplishments have been recognized. In other words, the recognition must be international in scope, meaning that the letter writers should come from different parts of the world, not just one country, or the letters should refer to the foreign national’s accomplishments in various countries.
And Now to the Hubby's Booth.........
The reasons for the sale are that with the new 35 hour week in France the restaurant decided to only open five days a week and close down for six weeks of the year, this was to accommodate the legal required number of holidays that the staff have to have here in France. Hence, they have been selling less wine. The money raised will be used partly to buy new wines, (yes the Bordeaux 2009 was mentioned) and to fund modernization and development projects at the restaurant.
Have you stamped today?? until next time.. Vicki
- God Forgives, I Don’t, July 31st.
Here are some practical ways to facilitate your “lightening up” on your journey out to sea (or however you manifest your “escape to freedom”).
There was a stream of water,
If you read the post last Friday about the offer I received then you would know that I had planned to spend the weekend focusing on the pros and cons of the job that was presented to me. If you read the post on Saturday about how unplanned my weekend ended up being then you may have wondered when was I going to get time to think about what I had to – and that was such a great question because not even I knew the answer.
This sounds bad. It's not. In the past couple of months we have settled in from our move from Hawaii into our new home, gotten the kids into a great routine, and, most excitedly, welcomed our new little one! Our family of 5 is now a family of 6 and I never knew how much adding one little peanut to the clan would make such a difference in the dynamics of everyday life.
it will be isaac's first time seeing the ocean... or any large body of water, for that matter.
Severely injured Jack completes his last task of restoring the light and the water.
Step 10: Application of witch hazel toner on face
I played a gig this week. That counts. I thoroughly indulged and challenged my artist self. It counts more because I’ve been finding it a bit of a pain to get any gigs booked at the moment. I’ve been slightly out of touch with the acoustic gig circuit and it’s been slow getting in contact with any promoters and getting sets, finding out which nights are worthwhile nowadays in London, or just not completely booked until February.
7 Fun Facts about You:
Perhaps the answer lay
In South Asia, it doesn’t seem to matter to a woman if she lives under a Muslim or Hindu religion – she is treated equally bad under one as the other. This must be seen as a South Asian cultural regionalism that transcends even major religions. The South Asian region has simply inherited a common culture which treats women the worst on Earth.
I swear I’m alive…or at least I’m relatively certain I am. Let me explain.
Here, we’ve got the River Song Big Answer. Or, rather, we’ve got a River Song Big Answer because there are still some others out there lying around. Since Moffat first introduced River back in the Tenth Doctor adventure, SILENCE IN THE LIBRARY/FOREST OF THE DEAD, the question of who she is has been the topic of speculation.
Prediction? It will quickly lose its fizz among women who don't like being condescended to.
Travel
Also, since the US is no longer the fastest growing economy in the world, to totally isolate us from countries like China and those of South America would create a large GAP in employment for US citizens. Isolationism is not the answer. I agree we shouldn’t be deployed overseas as much as we are, and definitely not fighting in the Middle East, but we don’t isolate potential markets because Paulites think that the “US can take care of itself.”
Ideal Orgs, or Ideal Ponzi Scheme?
Impression Obsession designers are previewing some of the beautiful new stamps this week, just released in preparation for CHA. This is Day Four of the reveal. For your chance to win some IO stampin' dollars, visit here to read all about it.
There was an interesting result to this. First, only one person got it right. Second, of those who got it wrong, everyone apart from one thought the correct answer was Josie. And third, something a bit odd and Wastedesque has happened. See, when I thought of the two wrong options of Josie and Laura, I thought I was doing it purely randomly, just picking names out of my head and they could have been anything. Then I forgot about it. A few days ago, I started writing a new book. I couldn't think of the character's name at first, and then the name I chose was...Josie, again thinking it was just any name. Only when I looked at all the competition entries last night did I realise that a) Josie was one of the false options I'd given you, and b) that everyone apart from two of you would think that was the correct answer.
There is only one basic reason why Christianity exists and that is the fact that Jesus Christ truly rose from the grave.
I know, I've been absent a while now but, homemade gifts for an extended family, which includes friends, of almost 30 people and then a few special neighbors, can take some time. Oh and did I mention the presents that need wrapping, the baking that has invaded the kitchen?!
After showering and some of our snacks and drink, we headed to the Shore Bird for dinner. One of the flight attendants recommended this cook-your-own-steak place, which sits beachside. It wasn’t on my list of dining options but Tony wanted to go there. We were seated in a very dark area, so I asked to be moved. There was no way either of us could read the menu so I knew we wouldn’t be able to see what we were eating. We had a drink at the bar while waiting for a better table. Our table had plenty of light but was close to the grill area, although it wasn’t too hot.
What researchers witnessed is sleepwalking cats doing things they’d normally do while awake — walking, swatting their forepaws, even pouncing on imaginary prey.
I could fall asleep believing that all hope is never gone?
And oh yeah, to all those who's blogs I just pimped? Tag ... you're it! ;)
Excerpt: In light of the May Day arrests of the Cuyahoga 5, the Occupy Wall Street–affiliated group of men who planned to blow up a bridge in Cleveland, Ohio, I called the Southern Poverty Law Center to find out of they had any plans to start tracking the Occupy movement. The first person I spoke to was so shocked by the question that she paused for a good 15 seconds before promising to put me in touch with a representative. This she eventually did, however, and after a game of cat-and-mouse — the person she’d found for me was busy “hosting an international conference on right-wing extremism,” natch — we managed to touch base and I to pose the question: “Do you have any plans to start tracking Occupy Wall Street after a hate group tried to blow up a bridge?”
The class disparity is deepened by the political establishment’s dependence on and commitment to mass immigration and Multiculturalism. Immigrants now form an all but unified bloc of voters which national and local politicians must assiduously court. There is no going back: any attempt to put the brakes on Muslim expansion would threaten the political, social, and economic order.
This morning, I woke up and realized I had not phoned my mother in over 48 hours, oops. I went ahead and bit the bullet, dialed the number and hoped that she would rush me off the phone. It's not that I don't have any interest in communicating with her, but I really despise chit chat. I like to say what needs to be said and then hang up. It inevitably causes conflict between us, it's a familiar dance at this point.
I try to stay awake through the Sunday morning church
#8
Scenes like these make Chalice brainless, but never boring. Underlying every pretentious shot is an honest sense of anguish, and we truly believe that, before too long, something bad is going to happen to these people. Better apoplexy than indifference. And anyway, the poses are particularly gorgeous, thanks to Ingram’s sense of composition and willingness to fill the frame with his actors’ bodies. His men and women look huge onscreen, especially for the time; their beauty and ugliness, their very different appearances relative to one another, give the film an abundance and virility lacking in many films of the mid-teens.
This Week’s Training: April 30th – May 6th
21-Darlene Pavlick (gets an extra entry)
UPDATE:-
The Israeli shells had scythed through them as they lay in the United Nations shelter, believing that they were safe under the world's protection.
SASHA LILLEY
A Saison Darkly is part of the Stillwater Import Series. Stillwater Artisanal Ales is a brewery based in Baltimore, Maryland; its founder and brewer Brian Strumke visited Belgium to brew A Saison Darkly. Named in reference to the movie “A Scanner Darkly,” this beer may be criticized for not being a genuine Belgian brew. However, A Saison Darkly was brewed in Belgium, with the brewing equipment of Sint-Canarus.
17. What Air Strikes? presents a video by RT, which challenges NATO's claims about Gaddafi's air force launching air strikes on Benghazi. Given the reliance upon sections of the Liberal Left on the argument that Gaddafi was about to commit massacres in Benghazi, this is important. Subsequently, Channel 4 News reported that Amnesty International and otehr International agencies had reported that there was no evidcence to support the claims of the Imperialists that were used to justify their intervention.
In addition, the muscular shape, strongly flared wheel arches, chunky added wheels, and also tyres sitting squat at four 4 4 corners of the car is the car look much more impressive.
Aside from cooking the squash, prep takes about 15 minutes. Plan cooking time accordingly.
if you are not generous
like a child's pull-toy since I was a girl of eight.
* An obvious focus on self
Social Networks, Jewish Identity, and New Media
I posit a different theory. While there may be prominent artists, I don’t presume anyone a “Great Artist”. Ultimately an artist is an artist. Likewise, art is art. I’m of the same train of thought as D’Angelo that art is anything that helps bridge the gap between what is and what is higher. The difference I see in art of our modern age is in the meaning of the last three words of the previous sentence. What is “what is higher” AKA the Divine?
I glance backwards once before disappearing into Metro City’s maze of streets and skyscrapers. He shrugs, apparently unconcerned with my sudden departure, and heads for the fire escape he used to climb up there in the first place. Even though nobody else is around, he’s talking. Then I realize that he probably knows the exact range of my hearing. He’s not talking to himself – he’s still talking to me.
Sonos, the Cadillac of household streaming digital media supports all four of these services. Roku, the Chevy of such services does offer MOG and Rdio, and I hope they offer the other two in the future. MOG has also made plans to integrated into TVs, Blu-ray players and cars. What this will mean is your HDTV, which people often connect to good sound systems, will become a streaming music player. This beats the crap out of Apple TV as a music player. Just imagine a TV with MOG and Netflix, what a combo that will be!
As this is not likely to be resolved in the near future I have no recourse but to remove myself and my family from the house that myself and my father before me have been living since the 1970’s – and find rented property where we will not be drowned like rats.
Naurin and Rehman were shot dead Nov. 1 when their car was ambushed near the northeastern Pakistan city of Gujrat. The car's driver and several other passengers were uninjured.
Cast : Tom Berenger, Raymond Cruz, William Forsythe, Luis Guzmán, Richard Brooks, Ana Azcuy, Diane Venora, Glenn Plummer, Sharron Corley, Vincent Laresca, Maurice Compte, Marc Anthony, Ernie Hudson, Beau Weaver, Cliff De Young
The MCO team spends a lot of their time on fly development and has the patterns you need. We will be putting together some fly packages for purchase.
“Chunnie, you’re coming over to my place tonight right?” He nodded.
The building music in the second half of the trailer transitioning to the Bane Chant is just pure bliss. A popular move to use when teasing a finale such as this, but they often work and it’s no different in this trailer.
Photo Credit:
I joined the Indonesian Heritage Society a couple of weeks ago. I thought that I would be able to go visit places that I would not go by myself. This is true and joining this group provides you with many opportunities for that. If you are new to the country, it is a great place to learn about Indonesia and also meet people and make friends. If you are brand new to the city and do not have a car, it would be better to join the group with someone you already know and ask to be assigned in the group with your friend(s). You also have to participate in planning trips, so knowing someone in the group makes it easier for you to plan a trip together and that is more fun. I joined the group hoping that I would be able to go on a tour with my friend, but she joined a weekly explorer group and I was a bit overwhelmed to join the weekly group, so I decided to join a monthly explorer group. Therefore, I ended up joining a group not knowing a single person, which is fine as I am not at all shy. However, because I don’t have a car and I could not find anyone who could give me a ride, I ended up taking a taxi to a site. It was fine as I use taxi all the time and used to it, plus I have a little bit of Indonesian to get by, but it would be hard if you don’t. This probably doesn’t happen to many people, but if there is anyone out there who is interested in joining the IHS, but you are a bit shy, I think you feel more comfortable joining the group with a friend or two. Just a little two-cent from my own experience.
Now the more I learn about the commercial & Entertainment industry, it’s made me realize we are all a commodities. Viewer ship can be translated into dollar signs depending on what demographic a person can fall in. So this new interpretation has influenced the art piece that has helped shape a narrative to my short film.
Bottom line: It's a hodge podge, crazy nightmare of a pool.
"I didn't personally comment on a lot of the other boards because they were just personally offensive to me," said Susana. "But I did go over to a bunch of other boards to see what other people were saying, and they were violently defensive: I don't care what any of these Afghani women have to say. I'm looking at it this way because I know better, and I know that this is oppressive.' They really didn't even care what women of color had to say. Like women of color don't really understand that they're being oppressed. They took away any work women of color have been doing for years."
Peace like a River – Breathtakingly beautiful honesty. I can relate to this post in a lot of ways and I think a lot us can.
A quick run down of colors I used:
Our company is renowned for its specialization in handling lightweight paper, and we are one of the few companies in the world that is capable in handling 22 gsm paper. The paper that we use is from the French company Bollore, which is renowned for its high-quality lightweight papers that have a high opacity level. For this reason, the paper is not only durable and very suitable for books, but it has a very premium look and feel as well.
It seems that many of us have learned the art of not fully feeling what we feel. We may not know exactly how or when we picked up this skill along the way, but we can sense its presence in how we’ve become expert dismissers (“Ah, it’s not that big of a deal”), second-guessers (“Should I really be feeling this way?”), or harsh inner-critics (“I can’t believe you would feel such an embarrassing feeling”). These inner comments not only stop us from truly experiencing our emotions, they also keep us from seeing any value in our feelings or in the messages they contain.
-- BEACOM CAVE
Make your voice heard.
They're saying you threw yourself into the sea, is what they're saying now. They who don't know you, they who really have no right to say anything about you. Like me. Except your face is all over the place on posters, which means you belong to everyone now. The man on the street knows everything about everything and you're part of everything now. You should probably be made aware of that.
And the calorie count for this flavor was not bad at all! One serving was 1/3 of the pizza,
The actual sources are snippets of paragraphs from the below sources, not extracts. These photos are all the given information for our two-source used in the ten and twenty mark history, 1960′s related assessment. A text version is available below:
My mom was good enough to come visit this past week. I know…sad. Still no blogging even with backup on hand. And I only worked out once. But, in my defense, I did a ton of Hawaii move prep that would have been awful to attempt to do without her help. So, I say VICTORY! One of the moving tasks I knocked out was taking my car to New Orleans to ship. We combined that trip with a visit to the local aquarium there so the kiddos got some reward for all that time in the car. More pics to come on that in a future post. However, I will share this video from that trip. Ryan took his mad dance skills on the road. When we left the aquarium and started to walk, Ryan heard some music. He booked it over there and showcased his moves for everyone to enjoy.
How are you using your plowshare and your pruning hook for God’s glory today? Ask God to show you how He wants to use your skills, resources, and relationships to prepare for the great harvest He has planned.
These guys are making the Do-Nothing Congress of 1948 look downright busy and productive by comparison.
Of course I didn’t know what the temperature was when I stepped out. I just knew it was really cold. I had gloves, my warmest running hat, a sweatshirt and my wool socks on but I was also wearing knee length running pants and the bottom portion of my legs were icy. Still, I was so happy to get out there and run in celebration of Jon’s victory it didn’t really phase me.
so many of us have gotten our start, or benefited from Bob's website in some way. there is a ton of information there, and now a new forum where we can ask questions, share our stories, and glean information on the mobile lifestyle. please come join us, we will be glad to have you!
In electronic media, we all know what Easter Eggs are…those hidden gems among our favorite video games, videos, and the like. Well, it just so happens that there are Easter Eggs in Of Sun & Moon and in the spirit of the upcoming Easter holiday, I wanted to share a few of them with you.
All pleasures and all pains, remembering
The Give Back Yoga Foundation is an organization that provides funding to yoga teachers, yoga studios, and other organizations who make yoga available to those who might otherwise not have an opportunity to experience its healing benefits. In fact, the Give Back Yoga Foundation provided some support to Samdhana-karana Yoga when we first opened our doors.
Recovery from back pain takes time. I know this all too well, but my current and seemingly minor symptoms have been hanging around for seven months and progress has been snail-like.
The ladder incident (or rather the latest ladder incident) led to an epiphany. I have a large truck. It has this really nice and strong camper shell. The garage is open at the moment and, you know, it's right there, so...
In early 1967 Clapton’s status as Britain’s top guitarist was rivalled by the emergence of Jimi Hendrix, an acid rock-infused guitarist who used wailing feedback and effects pedalsto create new sounds for the instrument. Hendrix attended a performance of the newly-formed Cream at the Central London Polytechnic on 1 October 1966, during which Hendrix sat in on a double-timed version of “Killing Floor“. Top UK stars including Clapton, Pete Townshend, and members of The Rolling Stones and The Beatles avidly attended Hendrix’s early club performances. Hendrix’s arrival had an immediate and major effect on the next phase of Clapton’s career, although Clapton continued to be recognised in UK music polls as the premier guitarist.
I've often wondered what love would look like, if I ever found it again. Would it make sense? Would the timing be right? How would I recognize it? Am I so jaded from broken hearts and missteps that it would just pass me by? Or would I know it without a doubt?
And as I left the store I couldn't help but remember my little rubber giraffe. Thinking that someone may have found it behind the meat compartment while they were renovating the store. Just a half chewed faded yellow and brown rubber toy, sitting in the same dark spot for forty-seven years. With it's two litte eyes just staring into space, and always wondering what ever happened in the "Grand Union" that day back in 1960, when it was left behind.
B: 1 slice 12 grain (homemade) bread with 1 tsp natural pb and 1 tsp no sugar added jam
Which reminds me of another thing Allen called Nolan 'Buddy' tonight and Nolan looked at me all sad and said, "Daddy called me Buddy, my name is Nolan" - we've been using Buddy and terms of endearment since he was born... I hope he continue to be sad when we use them, though we had just told him it was not okay to call me "Mommy Bob" as he seems to use Bob or Bobby when he seemingly trying to be mean by calling you a name.
I would consider it as one of best moments in my life and always be a memorable one to ever last and I quite forget holding the camera to take photos along with them but my memories captured the in-erasable portrait of hers. Love u mom!
1 wiry
You wonder, “Baby, what has gotten into you?” yet you are so aroused concerning her TAKE-CHARGE behavior.
Temperature dropped to -30 and the pipes froze, plumber came after 14 hours of waiting for him, he only charged me $1400 to replace all my pipes.
to watch them die.
With diet and less activity than usual I managed to live a relatively normal life. Mostly I learned how to be dependent on the Lord and trust that He would show up when I really needed Him. But God didn’t want me to get by. He wanted me to thrive. I had in my teenage years gotten prayed over for healing. I would name it and claim, and a few weeks later be angry that I still felt like crap.
God of might and power,
Sour grapes?
Flat screen TV is one of the latest additions in the home equipment industry. For those who plan to buy and use the television set in their homes, it is important that they know the different features of plasma TVs and LCD TVs. Additionally, it is also important to identify the advantages of flat screen TVs with Cathode Ray Tube TVs.
The INTP’s Thouroughly Devastating Analysis
What’re you doing for Valentine’s Day?
BEST ORIGINAL SCREENPLAY: Will Reiser, 50/50 – Will Reiser found himself with cancer in his 20s. He went through a lot and eventually beat it, then he did what all artists do: he channeled it into art. Now people who have only seen the trailer are probably asking “Art? Isn’t this the movie where Seth Rogen tells his buddy to use his cancer to pick up chicks?” Yes it is that movie. 50/50 is riotously funny at many parts. It’s also deeply moving. It’s a movie that runs the full spectrum of human emotion, all pulled from Reiser’s real-life experiences (though the film is technically fictionalized).
To be registered and notified.
Die: PTI Just the Ticket, Hearts border
I wish I had a photo of each of these women that I got to meet and spend time with......Especially sweet Joy aka Dusty Penny, Julie Ebersol and so many others Wonderful Wonderful Women!!
It's been a rough week: the start of a new semester with children whose medication runs out by the time they get to my class, stupid drama about Josué that I don't want to even dignify with a response, my vice principal's wife decided to go into labor three weeks early and then I became a dumping ground for responsibility...it's been loco, y'all.
Soured Dairy Products
GD: I am still a kid.
I put a screw through a piece of plywood to hold up the knobs of this sort, and then sprayed around them. I sprayed a coat of primer and then continued on with two coats of the black Rustoleum Painters' Touch in matte finish.
Bigger than Jesus with the Woodstock crowd
Now with these new found responsibilities, I have not been able to purchase my usual Forever 21 or sephora orders.. I am sad.. very sad..
We are in danger of a change so large as to dwarf any event in American
Claro M. Recto and Antonio Barredo for petitioner.
(Adapted from Giada De Laurentiis)
Kazoku no Uta (01) 6.1%, (02) 3.6%, (03) 3.4%, (04) 3.1%, (05) 3.3%
Let loose the dreadful wrath
One of my favorite genres is Pulp Science Fiction. As amazing as fantasy is to game in, so is this type of science fiction fun. Really they are almost the same thing with their exotic locations, strange powers, colorful races and fantastic adventures lurking around every corner.
Good evening! Yesterday afternoon was very wild and windy - a perfect excuse to spend some time indoors making Christmas cards! It always takes far longer than I realise to make batches of cards, which is one of the reasons I have failed to prepare adequately for both of the Christmasses that my Etsy and Folksy shops have been open (there's no point linking to them, they're empty for the third Christmas in a row ;-)). To be ready for when everyone else starts to feel festive, I need to have started my Christmas crafts in August, but that's still camping and cider-in-the-garden time, not crochet and tinsel time!
We need affection from those we love. A hug, a pat on the back, a touch on the arm, further more a kiss, holding hands...we want to feel affection from those we love and children need affection. Hugs, sitting in your lap, holding their hand as you go for a walk, the act of touching (obviously I'm speaking of healthy interaction) builds affirmation and shows affection. Be the one to teach your children what healthy, normal affection looks like. It will go a long way in shaping how they view affection and how they seek to fill a void if there is one.
and guide us when perplexed;
Asian: 27 (2.7%)
Until somehow yer soul is sort o’ wrapped round everything.
The reason firehouses have circular stairways is from the days when the engines were pulled by horses. The horses were stabled on the ground floor and figured out how to walk up straight staircases.
To all the volunteers I think that you're great!!!!!
Inside, there was not much more affection for Hodg son. The tabloid’s chief sports writer, Steven Howard, was distinctly underwhelmed by Hodgson’s opening press conference and hinted heavily that his preferred choice for the job was someone else: “It wasn’t the all-singing, all-dancing debut we might have expected from Harry Redknapp with journalists rolling around in the aisles and the men who might have appointed him but didn’t slapping each other on the back and thinking: ‘He’s got them eating out of his hand already.’”
Happy Easter everyone---I guess you will just have to take the Christmas holidays and national patriotic holidays as well
The barman gives us the evils. I smolder like a mildly rohypnoled Steve McQueen. Party Time pants like an angry dog.
We offer 6 rooms with double beds for 12 people, two shared bathrooms with own kitchen. Facilities and services: TV, cable TV, bow trout, ATV rental, central heating / hot water non-stop Guide to the Borsa, Maramures. Sights: Nature Reserve Pietrosul Rodna Horse Falls, equipped with ski lifts nearby natural trampoline jumping height of 90m, mineral springs, lakes Iezer, Lala, Stiol, Peak Pietrosul Rodna, Vaser Valley, there will can walk with mocanita, Prislop, monasteries Maramures Iza Valley and Valley of Dreams, Memorial Pain Merry Cemetery in Sapanta Sapanta Peri Monastery with the tallest tower in Europe.
Yes -- and when you die too,
“Too many of the Government’s green initiatives are ill-thought out and look set to be ineffective and costly – from the £11bn smart meter fiasco, the poorly planned Green Deal, the feed in tariff where costs have tripled and the carbon floor price that will push up fuel bills without incentivising investment.
My seventeen year-old son is going to prom too.
Turkey Hill Egg Nog .75/1 - expires 4/30/2011
Since the on-line transcript of the lineup is awkward to access, I thought I would type up the relevant sections of the lineup, with commentary from me, and from various experts along the way.
that stood here when we came. The ground
QUIRKS: “Winds of destiny… Change!” You’ll get really sick of hearing The Scarlett Witch say that every time she uses her power. Also: She seems to have two different voice actors, depending on the episode. WTF?
These guests, as one might guess, are ranked households per respective income, and then gathered into groups of 20%, or quintiles. And the couscous, of course, is total GNI. Yes, the richest 20% captured almost half of GNI in 1999, while the poorest 20% could afford only 6.53% of the national income, and 10 years later, the richest increased their share to the expenses of almost everyone else.
As you can see our heroes are back in the USA, Hawaii that is. I love how this card turned out, it is uber-bright and i love bright. Obviously i used Gina K's farmyard friends, along with my Langley Boy Designs palm trees and SU's Do the Hula and farmyard wheel (for the clouds...again...heehe)As stated in a previous post I have started embossing the stamped images to make coloring more easy(no bleeding) and I still gotta say it makes for a nice clean look. I mean look at the surf board, ordinarily, with me anyway, the red marker would bleed into the yellow and make it look crumby, but there it stands clear as day. I love it. I also like how the cuttle bug embossing turned out, don't know if you noticed it but only the center of the real red is embossed and i think it looks cool. I just made the card stock 3/4 of an inch to big on both dimensions and voila centered embossing. And in case you are wondering the sand on the beach is sandpaper!
You see, I have this suspicion that they were less offended that Jesus said what he said than they were offended by who he said it to. You see, the Pharisees and Lawyers were famous for their strict attention to the details of the law, to the Letter of the Law. They were noted for their teaching that only through strict adherence to the Law was pleasing God possible. Here comes a man, a man in their books obviously beset by a world of guilt: Why else would he be paralyzed? Everyone back then knew that sin was always the cause of suffering. Here was a man justly suffering because of his sin and Jesus without batting an eye:
I invite you to join the journey with me. I do not claim to have all the answers. If anything, I have more questions than answers. But if Jesus is who he said he is, and if his promises are as rewarding as the Bible claims they are, then we may discover that satisfaction in our lives and success in the church are not found in what our culture deems most important but in radical abandonment to Jesus.
‘Stones make a wall, walls make a house, houses make streets, and streets make a city. A city is stones and a city is people; but it is not a heap of stones, and it is not just a jostle of people.’ – Jacob Bronowski
Last fall, I spent two weeks in Florida with my parents as Dad had another small setback physically. The setback threatened to make changes in their living environment, but thus far, only minor changes have needed to be made, thankfully, and they are still living on their own, in their own cozy Brooksville home, with some help 5 mornings a week from a dear lady named Shirley. Dad is 80 and Mom will celebrate her 80th birthday in May, so all things considered, they are certainly doing very well, and we are grateful to God for his protective, loving and healing hand that holds them close.
Monday: culture fest: great dinner and got some homework done.
Change the language. While we're working on the words, let's replace "I don't like vegetables" with "I don't like canned peas". Let's substitute "I don't like creamed vegetables" with "I don't care for creamed carrots." That way, the language itself leaves open the possibility of liking vegetables -- versus excluding the entire family of vegetables, versus nixing a particular vegetable, versus forgoing all vegetables prepared a certain way.
of you
I have to say it again- I am so proud to be the team leader of such a talented bunch of stampers! The cards designed by TEAM S.A.S for this and every challenge seriously rock! I hope you get inspired by them to make a card for a child and enter it in our Anything Goes challenge. You have until February 17th at noon CST to enter your card for a chance to win. After entering, please consider sending in your card(s) to Send a Smile 4 Kids to cheer a child who is inpatient in one of the seven hospitals we are now donating to. All the information you may need is under the tabs at the top.
In Japan, meanwhile, the status quo is expected to remain on hold until the March 31st end of the fiscal year because of overwhelming workloads in the bureaucracy and the parliament. After March 31st, there will be concrete negotiations taking place involving the Finance Ministry, Bank of Japan, Prime Minister’s office and Royal Household Agency aimed at setting up a new international economic planning agency.
Lucy is seventeen when she discovers that the women of her family have been cursed through the generations, forced to attempt three seemingly impossible tasks or to fall into madness upon their child's birth. But Lucy is the first girl who won't be alone as she tackles the list. She has her fiercely protective foster parents beside her. And she has Zach, whose strength amazes her more each day. Do they have enough love and resolve to overcome an age-old evil?
More often than not, my license name goes into the system of whatever company I am trying to change my name with. Then it’s false bc that isn’t my real name in its entirety.
In the meantime - put your oven on 150-180 degrees Centigrade .Boil a kettle with water.
window
A big welcome to the new followers of this blog!
Then install the dog in the pet hotel so she doesn’t have to walk him for a month.
Matthew Byrne, who ran the Young Person's Advisory Service in Liverpool, was initially charged with five offences but now faces a further nine offences.
2 cups Epsom salts or organic cane sugar
Every step I'm taking
-You mainly wear size 3/6 months clothes, but there are still some 0/3 month things you can wear.
KROFT: No feelings of guilt?
14. Outerspace - Last Laugh
Thanks so much for stopping by to say "hi" it is always a joy to read who visited me.
Boy, am I tired! Just got back from the Asheville Animal Fiber Festival. Rode in with Betsy the Goat Yoda, her daughter and grand-baby. Lots of cool stuff. I bought a drop spindle and am going to try to learn to use it. Took some piccies and will report more on that in another post.
Dianne Kohler-Barnard, DA spokesperson for safety and security, said the state spent R312-million a year to keep VIP protection service officers in the field - a figure she received in a parliamentary question she submitted.
Update, 1:53pm: I know you are dying to have my Brussels sprouts recipe, so I've included it in the comments. If you still don't like Brussels sprouts after this, then I've done all I can to help you.
Healthy Mix foundation is also supposed to be awesome – I’m happy with Max Factor Experience for now (and have a couple of bottles to get through!) but I’ll definitely check it out after that.
The French accordion-virtuoso Richard Galliano is an exceptionally versatile musician, able to make his mark in all kinds of musical contexts, from solo appearances to playing with a full big band.
Brain fart - I got nothing interesting to say! I can't even make anything up ... all my ideas are sitting on the sidelines as they are all for my books. Oh! Here we go:
7. There will be more defined lines between Beer Geeks and Gateway Craft beer drinkers.
I love that this quote validated my very lazy decision to skip my tempo run last week. I had been feeling a bit guilty about it but no more. My laziness will make me the best runner I can be! Thanks Coach! Seriously though, I have definitely got a lazy streak in me lately! Seems that I'm proving that with every day and every run that goes by without a simple bleep on the bloggy world radar. Sheer laziness! Well, I have been crazy busy with life in general, too. You know the usual suspects- running the kids here to there, cleaning the house in preparation of a visit from the in-laws (they come tomorrow!) and trying to squeeze in my runs in the absence of any real downtime. Exhausting. So, here's a little of my training thus far this week-
So...though the bills are looming and in reality, i might lose my house, i need to continue to focus on positive things...to keep moving...keep applying for jobs and keep real real real close to my Heavenly Father who holds all things in His very capable hands.
Scarves are sort of a cliched gift, I guess, but they work for a reason, and this one is based on a 13th century Chinese scroll! Awesome! Perfect for your friend who's into Asian history or art.
This will be quite awkward if he is wrong.
Martha Stewart: Doily Lace Edge punch, Foilage punch
Where to Find SpiritHoods:
There’s just something about that fragrance…
As for DDV (that’s what us Divos call it), the writing is delectable and the acting really gives you something you can sink your teeth into (seriously, no pun intended here). Think of it as a mash-up of Ally McBeal and Sex in the City, with a hint of Real Women Have Curves. And that fat chick? She’s hot!
Anytime we get together is our special time to knit. Picking a special location would be The Office aka Starbucks. Curl’s steaming hot decaf Americana and Q’s black iced tea, no water, no sweetener – what a way to start the day. Our bags are full of “stuff” to share with each other. We move the chairs around to the perfect position so the sun isn’t in our faces. After all of the sharing and drinking and snacking (ok, we do get a snack), we pull out our knitting project. Curls is such a fast knitter that she is usually further along than Q. It helps that we do any new parts of the project together, especially with the Norwegian Star slipper project. In the slipper project there was a typo when we got to the instep and with one reading and one knitting it was easy to figure out the problem.
The executive in charge of our division advised against even calling Dave for an interview. “He won’t stay,” she warned. Fortunately my direct supervisor was willing to take a calculated risk. If he would stay for only a year, it would be worth it.
Chief Conservator of Forests Kuldeep Kumar said the department had transferred 713.911 hectares of land to the NHAI.
This morning I was explaining all this to my younger daughter, telling her that he had bought me a ticket to the Girls’ Night Out. She said, you know, he’s just controlling you. And then she said, wine makes you feel bad, and he bought you a ticket to a wine tasting.
b) take no further action for now.
Well it did until I started reading the list of qualifications. The one that concerned me the most stated that a student should..."be able to perform self-care activities with minimal supervision."
Enter one style or both for the next two week.
Just like you,” Sally cried.
should in its attempts to compensate for America's historical injustices
Yoo hold my heart in your hands,
Fighting crime just to save the world! The lyrics went something like that, right? Eh, my childhood is fuzzy...but what I do remember is Blossom being one of my favorite PowerPuff girls since she was the medium between both Bubbles and Buttercup...but as I got older I've liked the butt-kicking attitude of Buttercup. Who was your favorite character from the show?
Can't I read just one less website or play just one less game so I can spend just one more minute with them?
Ever since, I have purchased a roll of Pillsbury slice and bake gingerbread dough...when I could find it. It's not easy to find...and this year I've been unsuccessful.
And she eyed the moon so bright,
Accessories - Fancy Favor die, Labels Framelit die, Heart to Heart Punch, diamond jewel, small scallop punch, very vanilla seam binding, brads
But then the experience sours. They get sick of catching only every other word. And they begin to meet people less willing to make sense of their accents. Nothing stinks more than being misunderstood at every turn in your day.
I started this card with Very Vanilla and layered with Aqua Bazzill and some Material Girl DSP that I sewed a border around using my sewing machine (and shock, horror - it was actually straight!!! Wonders will never cease!!!). My big feature circle was made with two layers of Very Vanilla cut with Large Scallop Circle Nestabilities and then I pierced the scallops on top. Across the middle I added some aqua Bazzill and punched the bottom with Lace Border Punch and topped with some ivory satin ribbon. To the right I added an aqua circle and then popped up the daisies (from JustRite's Beautiful Blossoms stamp set) on top. (The daisies were stamped in Memento Tuxedo Black on X-press It Blending Card and coloured with Copics - E50, E51, Y21, Y35, G40, G82, BG11, BG15.) I then framed it by cutting out a frame using the Label 13 Nestabilities and popping it up on foam tape. To finish I added a big bow to the side and some Blush Pearls to the corners.
The next day (Oct 23) Numpang was taken before the district officer of Simunjan for a further remand and again sent to the lock-up. He remained imprisoned until he was released on Oct 25 at about 10.20am.
just in time for our annual new years celebration with the best buddies.
Mr. Rikus Ras' two toddlers went hysterical while about ten traffic "officers" assaulted their father.
“GAC has proven to be a terrific partner for the coverage of PRCA ProRodeo and the addition of Justin McKee will only enhance our fans’ viewing experience.” PRCA Commissioner Karl Stressman said. “I firmly believe the talented team assembled is the best in the business and its great our fans get to know and enjoy them year-round as we follow the road to the Wrangler NFR.”
If you’ve ever seen the wavering air above a hot road, or the heat shimmer over a hot kettle you’re already half-way to making a Schlieren image.
Then I considered all that my hands had done and the toil I had expended in doing it, and behold, all was vanity and a striving after wind, and there was nothing to be gained under the sun.
ABV: 8.5%
1 cup coarsely chopped pecans
This year FlyLady says "Go for 7 in 2011" so if 15 minutes is too much, go for seven minutes!
I rushed to her, lifted her off the boy, and held her. I was surprised at just how strong she was. Then she said one of the clearest sentences of her life. Eyes wild, body continuing to thrash, at the top of her lungs: I want my justice! What the hell? What kind of concept of justice have we been teaching her? Not even bothering to check and see if the boy was okay, I broke wide and ran over to my wife who was dozing in the grass. She lazily looked up at me, saw that I was shell-shocked; looked at our daughter, saw that she was going crazy, screaming about wanting her justice. The look she launched my way was purely: what the hell just happened? I cannot even take a rest without you two getting into some kind of trouble.
But when you take full financial and maintenance responsibility for a home, it’s yours to do what you please. Paint the walls purple. Add a planetarium. Put in a fireman’s pole. You’re in charge.
There I find comfort, and there I am blessed.
I think part of what I have come to realise is that I can achieve anything on my own – I have to, there is no-one else to pick up the pieces – but that sometimes I need someone else just to be on my side, to give me a hug, tell me its all ok, and to tell me I look amazing (even when I don’t!).
What really caught our eye was a menu of super strength speciality beers- Brewdog's 'Tactical Nuclear Penguin' (32% ABV) and the Dutch 't Koelschip brewery's 'Start The Future' at 60% ABV. The latter was barely drinkable due it's strength with the Brewdog offering being more flavoursome and easier to drink. At £5 and £7.50 respectively for a 25ml measure they were a must for beer geeks like us to sample.
The Good Greatsby recently got fired from his job on the Paradise Cruise Liners for causing a ship-wide panic when he was overheard saying, “Captain’s been eaten by the octopus who lives in the toilets, which wouldn’t be so bad if the Octopus didn’t decide to TAKE OVER AS THE SHIP’S NEW CAPTAIN!” Moral: Don’t believe everything you hear, especially if it involves a toilet-dwelling octopus.
But I have added “rampant meerkats” and “Baby Spice in chocolate” to the tags of this blog entry to get a better class of reader.
- line the mold with plastic wrap and pack the forcemeat in
Some of them are a little...I'm not sure I have a good word for it.
And a big round of applause to the winner of this week's special prize from Magnolia chosen at random is
Reminded of a world where he had all his fun
What if your wildest dream turned out to be true? What if it was more like a nightmare?
Returning to the hotel we enjoyed our twenty percent off dinner and then walked along the river until it was time for bed after repacking our panniers so that our Budapest clothes were easier to get at. There was also time to read about the Danube Bend that we would see the next day. Our time in Esztergom had been very pleasant and relaxing and now we were ready for the excitement of Budapest.
Trade winds for peace
The settlement agreement is in response to a jury verdict last month that found that Officer Adam Bailey used excessive force when he arrested Deshun M. Carter in 2009. The award included $35,300 in punitive damages.
that always failed to clear
Looking over the past month I've been moving around within a pound. Perhaps I've plateaued.
Get 1000 minutes, 1000 texts and 30mb data with the "all you need plan" for heavy users which in included in your monthly plan. Estimated for a yearly total of just $499.00! No activation, reactivation issues and you can call 911 for no extra charge!
If you are interested in seeing some of my adventures from last year, my old blog is still up – There and Back Again – Alaska. I have a lot of photos from my adventures and look at them often appreciating exactly where I live. If you look on the right hand side of the page you will see links to a number of photo albums. While not great, some of the photos are pretty good. I know that I sure enjoy going back and remembering all of the spectacular places I have put my feet…
I'm not sure who said "The only person you can change, is you." I don't know when I first heard it, but I really began to think about that quote.
by the broken
Yesterday, I withdrew from this year's A-Z blog challenge. I did the challenge last year and had a blast and met some awesome people, but after having some long conversations and doing a lot of thinking yesterday, I realized I need to take a step or ten back in some things. Between family and homeschooling and editing and writing and blogging, I realized I have barely had any time to actually write. I'm on a deadline to finish Rising Book 2--I need a complete first draft by April, which shouldn't be a problem if I can actually sit down and do it. I know what needs to happen and I already have lots of the book written. But as April is the A-Z challenge...yeah. You see my conundrum. Even though I already had decided on my A-Z blog topics and even jotted down some ideas, I knew how the month of April and part of March would end up some bizarre blogging time-vacuum.
Weekend Herb Blogging is a weekly event - running from Monday to Sunday with recaps posted every Sunday/Monday. While it's called Weekend Herb Blogging we don't limit ourselves to just posts dealing with herbs - we celebrate vegetables, fruit, nuts, seeds, flowers, grains - in fact if it is plant based, then we'll love to hear more.
You think the war in Iraq was costingus too much? Read this:
I reach out;
If Sloggers don’t mind, I’m going to ignore any and all comment threads saying ‘you will never take money out of politics’. Two Bills to ban direct lobbying and fund all political Parties through the State could achieve much of it in one afternoon. But apart from that, saying it’s impossible to do is kind of pointless really. We either want a better econo-political model or we don’t.
The Seyfarth team coordinated with the co-defendants in preparing claim construction positions, a technology tutorial, summary judgment briefing, and coordinating for the June 21 argument before the court.
When I was about 13, my ‘partner’ was a friend-like person. I probably told him “I like you”.
The dog is happy moving from sunny spot to sunnier spot, following the sun all around the property. I am happy now that the kitchen and bathroom are totally unpacked and everything put away tidily. My daughter is happy unpacking and rediscovering things like music, books, favourite bedding etc etc etc.
To view this MEMRI TV clip, visit
I have cautious optimism about the future of the Replicators. I prefer the spidery versions, but am resigned to the fact there is only so much that can be done with them that way. It is muh like the Borg from Star Trek. They were much scarier as a monolithic force of nature, but in order to keep using them, they had to evolve into something else. I just hope the Replicators do not become as watered down villains as Star trek: Voyager made the Borg. Is there any Trekkie out there who wants to see them again at this point?
Oregon SB 742 is OFIR’s current target. The bill would allow for undocumented immigrants, who have resided in Oregon for a minimum of three years, who have graduated from an Oregon high school and who have been accepted by an Oregon public university to pay in-state tuition. A similar bill has been proposed in Oregon four times and each time it has failed.
Last week's challenge really got some of you thinking and we had some super submissions.
Two kitten tongues are twice the fun!
Gage came and got Olivia and they were so nerves all giggles and so dang cute. I made them pose for pictures, because I knew this was a blogging moment!!!!
Lyall Lovett
really searching for?”
So disconnected from your needs that you withdrew into a world so far away, that I can’t even reach you.
Pressing into each other, arms locked, reluctant to let go. The moment can’t last. He gives her his monogrammed handkerchief to wipe the tears from her eyes. Staring at him, hands shaking she reaches to give it back.
That’s they beauty of love, isn’t it?
Tel : 603-56312877
I kept eating.
When I was in Boston for the Cubs/Red Sox series, I bought a pack of cards that were random for $2.00. I have decided to collect as many autographs out of that pack as I could. I have been limited in my success; I have sent out 11, and have only received 2 back. My second player back is Jerry Don Gleaton, former Royal, which I am also collecting.
Oh by the way, Maqil can now walk yaww! Hehe. I am so proud of him. Kira dia cepat sikit la dari Maryam who first walked when she was 16 months old. Mikhail paling cepat, 13 months old. Maqil kat tengah-tengah la, 15 months old, haha. Lambat sebenarnya compared to anak-anak kawan-kawan I but takde masalah pun. Okay je.
Garment of the Holy Priesthood: Also known as “garments” or “g’s.” As part of the temple endowment, which is completely unrelated to Freemasonry, Mormons are given the garment (actually two-piece underwear sets: t-shirt and shorts) to wear at all times. The garment has stitched into it certain marks that are in no way related to the Masonic symbols of the compass and square. The garment is said to be “a shield and a protection” to the wearer, though, contrary to belief, most Mormons do not believe the garment has magical powers, although J. Willard Marriott would disagree. The garment is also available in a one-piece version, but most people don’t wear it because it frequently causes a “celestial wedgie.”
Transition
I really do love books and feel bad about harming them. So another suggestion could be to purchase the books and then have copies made of what you want to use as artwork at your local copy store.
Life guarantees us two things: change and loss, together they make up the unpredictable rhythm of life. They also exert tremendous pressure on the soul. All the losses in our lives are significant, and each has shaped our beliefs about life, God and the world around us, that’s why it’s critical to recognize them, no matter how insignificant they may appear. Because most of us equate loss primarily with death, we’re unaware of how abstract losses like shattered dreams and unmet expectations can have serious long-range consequences on our hearts.
Acts 1:8:
I happened to be in the British Library this week, and there's a walk-in exhibition of children's poetry. I'd really recommend a visit if you can spare the time: one highlight for me was a notebook with Christina Rossetti's 'Who has Seen the Wind' in her own writing. There's also a letter by Ted Hughes, but the bulk of the exhibition is of printed books, old and new, open at some utterly wonderful poems, together with illustrations, some charming, others spine-tingling. Among the spine-tingling ones I'd include a version of 'The Highwayman' by Alfred Noyes, illustrated by Charles Keeping in his inimitable scrawly ink and wash. Atmospheric, menacing, and ever so slightly camp, his masked highwayman glitters in the moonlight on a pale ribbon of a road, under bare trees whose branches appear to undulate as if underwater.
It is commonly claimed that the Great Wall of China is the only man-made object visible from the Moon. This is false. None of the Apollo astronauts reported seeing any man-made object from the Moon. The misconception is believed to have been popularized by Richard Halliburton decades before
It's been over a year since i last made a blog entry..i sort of disappeared into my own world, waiting for the storm to pass...there's still some thunder, lightning and some howling winds, but i can't let another year pass by waiting...My new years resolution for 2010 was to regain my life, even if it meant being a little shipwrecked...
So there I am, handing over my 60p fine and my gaze alights on the winning entry. I remember that I have entered and my heart skips a little beat....well, someone's got to win after all. No, it wasn't me - it was a much longer entry. I am disappointed - with all those rushing accompanying thoughts that go something like: well of course you didn't win, why would you win? you can't write and numerous magazine editors feel that way and now, clearly so does the library service and so on (all in the space of about 2 seconds. Does anyone else do that? Just me?)
But events earlier this year in Belarus and Kyrgyzstan have made this neo-imperialism sound ever so hollow. The ethnic clashes in the latter and the failure of Russia to send a peace-keeping force, requested by the Kyrgyz government, is arguably the greatest demonstration of the limits of both power and ambition. After all, here is a country that is still not freed itself from the wars in Chechnya, or lost sight of its disastrous involvement in Afghanistan in the 1980s. The official line from Moscow was that it could not interfere in Kyrgyzstan’s internal affairs, a curious contrast with the previous intervention in Georgia.
They're all the rage...
Though Afghan Taliban brand themselves as a nationalist movement fighting for ‘independence’ and withdrawal of foreign troops, they are not supported by majority of Pashtuns, let alone other ethnic groups in Afghanistan. If there are free elections, the Pashtuns of Afghanistan would reject the Taliban, like Pakistani Pashtuns vote for the liberal Awami National Party.
Yes! La Rectoria de Sant Miquel de Pineda is open for business.
“I greatly enjoyed this book – I felt the tone, language and style were spot on – and it was really interesting to see life from the male perspective! I am not aware of many books that explore the male view of relationships and life to this kind of depth, which I think makes this a very interesting read, particularly for us girlies! Lots of intriguing angles and really believable characters and I enjoyed the ‘look back’ storyline alongside the current…. It also made me wonder about the impact of the spirits and character of those who have lived / been in houses we then live in… do we all leave a little bit of our soul in the places we have been?? Would recommend this to you – its a good read and a good experience.”
I can be a world champion in less than 5 years (with the necessary funding).
Pictured from left to right are A = Blade Nzimande, leader of the South African Communist Party. B = Zwelenzima Vavi, leader of COSATU (Congress of South African Trade Unions); C = Gwede Mantashe - ANC party spokesman and
03/12/2007 40.69
Notably, and possibly related to the gap of non-El Niño years since 2007, 2009 is not one of them!
My style is busy and colorful with lots of black lines that confuse the order in which the layers were made. I have a weird compulsion to inter-connect everything inside my artwork. And I am definitely going through a "German" phase!
When we finally arrived to Healing Hands, the place where we are staying for the next two weeks, our skilled bus driver impressed us with his reversing skills. We unloaded, and were shown to our rooms.
At times, the sidewalks of Manhattan are jammed with teaming masses and almost unwalkable. No one likes traffic, and most drivers will strive to take shortcuts and alternate routes to avoid congestion. Often, however, for both the pedestrian or automobile driver, only one road leads to Rome, and we must suffer that route.
-salt + blackpepper
EK Success
On another note, I remember a story my friend once told me about breaking up with a boyfriend. He asked her, “Don’t you love me anymore?”
But I had a very nice, gentle curve which is what the doctor wanted to see. She still sent my bloodwork out for a frucotsamine level, but based on the curve she saw, she dropped me down to 1unit of Lantus 2x a day. I’m so happy!!!
This is not the most appetizing title, but it describes the fact that we use the bruised apples from the Mexican market down the street. Four apples for a dollar — can’t beat it. Beyond that, the fruit is a sweeter because they have ripened quite a bit, and it lends more apple flavor to the dish. If Gourmet magazine ever asks why I used bruised fruit, that’s my story. It has nothing to do with my being cheap.
Update at 11:20 PM
For those of you who do not speak in internet acronym, today’s post will share a couple of NSVs (non-scale victories) that I have had this week (for the win!)
Ok, back to birthdays. In my opinion, there’s no better day to celebrate life and I think a birthday should be special for everyone. I’ve never understood the people who don’t want to make a big deal of out their’s or worse, get really depressed. You’ve made it one more year, so why not be happy about it and do something fun?!
We have a winner!
More recently, I had the Fire Burger at TBS. This one had me spewing Guy Fieri-esque colloquialisms like “killer,” “dynamite” and “off the chain.” Were I not so completely in love with it I may have been embarrassed. This was a beef patty, thick and juicy, topped with avocado which was drastically upstaged by habanero cactus jam. The jam was both sweet and zippy without being too much of either. I think habanero is a great ingredient with its peppery kick that wells up from the stomach after eaten, as long as it’s incorporated subtly so as not to obliterate one’s palette... and this was just right.
The song is presented so straightforwardly that by the end it has become monotonous. Only as the song fades out do you hear George's voice start playing with the bluesy edges of the song. By that point its too late.
Annex Children’s Theatre in Education, (A.C.T.E.), is an after-school, weekend and summer camp performing arts program for children and youth. Our full range of courses includes acting techniques, musical theatre, improvisation, movie-making, stage-craft, dance, and audition preparation. Each class ends with a final performance for family and friends to see.
Now what the Ryan plan calls for is a slowdown in the growth of Social Security and Romney calls for:
Along with their success has come some confusion over exactly which beehive is right to purchase. Currently there are over a dozen beehive spring styles out there, each offering some unique take, be it in the seat pocket diameter, ovate wiring diameter, pitch or internal spring “frequency.” Regardless increased selection has bred some minor confusion, albeit easily cured.
Over a period in which the annual number of FDI projects into Africa has more than doubled – from 339 in 2003 to 857 in 2011 – intra-African investment has grown exponentially with project numbers increasing from 27 in 2003 to 145 in 2011. As a result, in 2011, intra-African investment accounted for 17% of all new FDI projects on the continent.
2 Corinthians 1:12 (ESV)
No, you are not wasting your time. You are creating something that did not exist before, and that it is inherently worthwhile! You are developing your God-given talents and you are giving service to those who will read your words, even if it's just your family and friends. However, if you take it seriously enough, if you don't let anything stand in your way, it won't be just your family and friends. Who knows? You could write something that changes the world. President Uchtdorf also said:
Here are the details for the BOGO Sale...
I feel like brown goes with pictures of houses, kraft actually. I've been using so much kraft, I needed to choose something else. So I used brown Bazzill CS for the background and used some scraps and some chipboard embellies and twine from the MME Kraft FunDay. Thickers, CC Tiny Type, Pebbles Kraft alpha letters round it out. I fussy cut the chevron pattern on all the PP. The sketch is from the SLS eBook.
A senior U.S. defense official in Washington rejected witness accounts that several apparently drunk soldiers were involved. “Based on the preliminary information we have this account is flatly wrong,” the official said. “We believe one U.S. service member acted alone, not a group of U.S. soldiers.”
Google’s search result rankings are dictated by complex algorithms which take into account several hundred factors.
Sounds good doesn’t it? The polenta was just firm enough to be cut into triangles, yet still soft and tender when it came to cut it. The mushroom and artichoke hearts had been left nice and chunky, while the broccolini were still crisp and crunchy giving the whole dish a wonderful mix of textures and flavours. The tomato cashew marsala sauce was creamy and delicately spiced. Delicious and yet so simple.
I’ve read this book too many times to count. It is probably one of the most important books to me, after Harry Potter and a few others. It has influenced me: I call Neville a ‘wild thingie’, but Maurice Sendak was the original Wild Thing. In my Script Frenzy script, I had a scene where one character reads a picture book to another. You can guess what picture book it was. If you haven’t read Where The Wild Things Are, know that you have been living under a rock, then go to your library and borrow a copy to read right away. Better yet, buy a copy.
Written Preview
"Twenty-five lesbian, gay, bisexual and transgender participants, and 38 straight participants the night before, got a chance to find love before Valentine's Day during the library's first literary speed-dating events. The events drew so much interest that the library hopes to replicate them again soon.
Ah well, you only win the lottery once I suppose.
No Cheating, No Dying by Elizabeth Weil — kind of an unusual pick for us, but we’re all moms of young kids, so this is an area of interest for sure (it’s one woman’s story about how she tried to make her own marriage better).
04. Blind Vision – Don't look at Me (5:48)
The First regiment was formed in October, 1811, and saw action in 1812 at Ostrowno, light combat at Borodino, and led the 4th Corps in action at Maloyaroslavets. They fought again at Krasnoi and the Berezina. In 1813 battalions of this unit were part of the garrisons of Glogau and Magdebourg (where it took part in the battle of Hagelsburg in August, 1813).
We have been in Kansas City for the past few days with around 850 other Fellowship of Christian Athletes staffers and spouses at Realtime. It was full of encouragement, refreshment and fellowship with people from all over the country.
This does not bode well. Here we are at the start of the final holiday themed Friday Five, and iTunes shuffles up the angst ridden in my library.
Time is pressing on. With the plinky-plonky piano theme from Q5 in my head, I leave the churchyard for a quick circuit of the town – past the tree under which John Wesley last preached in the open air in 1790, past the Millenium Beacon which stands on a site overlooking the Brede Level once occupied by St Leonard’s Mill until this blew down in the Great Storm of 1987 – to head south along an avenue of lime trees, cows to the left, sheep to the right. On the edge of the modern town now, but there are signs that mediaeval Winchelsea once encompassed a larger area, before the silting of its harbour, like Rye, led to a decline in its fortunes. Like a shark’s tooth emerging from the ground, a ragged gable end wall is all that remains of St John’s Hospital, not a hospital in the modern sense, but one of four almshouses in the town. In use until the 16th century, this crumbling monolithic slab is the only fragment left, all vestiges of the other three (Holy Cross, St Bartholomew’s and St Anthony’s) having long since vanished. Other remains have been found buried on the finger-like ridge of Wealdstone that stretches several hundred yards to the south, a promontory into the surrounding low-lying marshland.
Dovere writes:
I am also busy working on our summer birthday parties.
The papers presented at the conference dealt with a wide range of related topics from various disciplines, such as history, philosophy, culture and traditions of Ismaili Muslims, and highlighted the degree of their study in Russian scholarship. Speakers at the conference represented various academic institutions, including University of Central Asia, University of Toronto, Tajik Academy of Sciences, Institutes of Ethnography, Anthropology, Linguistics and Oriental Studies in Moscow.
01 - Feel Like I Don't Know What I'm Doing
My little zebra kitten heels (last seen here) were perfect for all the walking I did - I probably walked about 6 kilometers/3.5 miles, including walking home. My bigass flower helped tie in the browns of the shoes and the bag.
-Even for those getting their news online, online cable TV news sites (CNN, Fox, MSNBC) are visited consistently higher than the entire aggregation of local newspaper sites, which also suggests that people’s understanding of local issues, arguably more important in people’s day-to-day lives than national issues, is declining rapidly.
Splotchy: yip yip
Okay, let's move along, and see what laws are still forgotten in the land of cotton and catfish:
The Romans had a god, Dionysus, the god of wine, who was celebrated along with the important times in life. (All praise Dionysus!)
Matthew was so, so, so, excited to be baptized on his 8th birthday! We were so excited and proud of him and his decision to follow the example of the Savior. Matthew was baptized and confirmed by Jeremy. Both of his grandpas served as witnesses and Grandma Cox gave a talk on the Holy Ghost. He was so happy the rest of the day and we talked about how that was the Holy Ghost letting him now he made the right decision. The next day Matthew gave a talk about his feelings about being baptized to his class. Throughout the day I kept thinking about his blessing day. It seemed like yesterday he was a sweet little baby that I was dressing for his blessing and now he has made a covenant with God.After Matthew's baptism and confirmation (and while we still had our family and friends gathered at the church), Calvin was given a name and a beautiful blessing by Jeremy. We are so grateful for this sweet little guy and what he has added to our family. Like all our other babies, Calvin had a special blessing blanket made in Bethlehem that I brought home from Israel.
“What difference – “ Johan was saying when the man interrupted him harshly.
This is a World wide giveaway open till June 20, 2012 and I can ship it to anywhere you live in this world. Anyone can participate in this if you fulfill the following requirements.
Dyke understands this is not the time to dish out a bollocking. He emphasises how even a game it is, commending us on our work rate. The game opens up in the second-half. Chris Pye looks closer to full fitness, shooting narrowly wide from distance on two occasions. He then sees a deft headed goal ruled out for offside. Town make it two-nil from a twenty yard free kick, side footed low past Jones’ left. We continue to huff and puff, but an all important goal remains elusive. Sam Schwodler remained philosophic after the final whistle. Equally unhappy with his own performance and the result, he said: “It’s depressing, but you have to forget about it and get on with the next game.” It seems like sound advice.
More interesting is that idiomatic Scala code is much less verbose than the Kotlin version. The Scala version (21 lines) is almost half the size of the Kotlin version (40 lines). The Java published on the blog linked above is 43 lines.
1 incapacity
We have had some beautiful weather lately, while the UK has been awash. Perhaps Ireland is trying to tell us something! It's gorgeous this morning too.
after three fab years living 'down south' we have decided to
He hadn’t noticed the constant, quiet filling of his Rakia glass, but he must have felt the effects, as three hours later, he appeared to have inadvertently eaten his own body weight in green salad before the main meal was even served.
Now, when the fridge is delivered on Thursday, the store will be getting an email from me. It will sing the praises of the people in the store and tear a new one in the delivery company. I figure it should be at least worth a gift card.
But truthfully, it is conflicting. When it is a recipe printed in a cookbook I have, originated in recent times, it seems right to share it. The requester could likely look it up (on the ‘net usually) and by sharing, I enjoy helping that person. Is it right to share out of a cookbook? Is it a disservice to the author of the cookbook?
Jim also recounts in nearly every chapter how much respect and reverence he experienced from the Chinese people themselves. When a stranger mysteriously shows up in a Chongqing coffee house, he inexplicably says that Jim would make Dr. Bethune proud. Jim continues:
Told myself that you were right for me
When I return then I never will leave
I've been collecting some likely suspects for this feature on duplicate images on book covers. I'm hoping some of you will chime in on these. What do you think?
Once you have learned and understand the basics of how much to save, how much to invest, what insurance you need, you can map out a plan- and stick to it!
*You’re watching a scary movie with your family and someone asks “Can ghosts really do that?” and you have an answer and an explanation.
Fanatical for Who has and currently is still on hiatus if my regular followers haven't already figured it out. I am sorry for not posting on this before. I had intended originally to be updating the blog but I ended up ill again. Then after just a day or two of feeling better I got injured and this has left me in a lot of pain.
Another painting in my series of painting my way through Kevin MacPherson's book. I just loved the way the sunlight spilled across his painting, making bright highlights on the mountains and trees, and casting the deep shadows. His painting is called, "Palm Desert".
Summer officially started for us last week. This is me at Ariel's Point in Buruanga, Aklan. Day trip from Boracay. Two hours of kayaking, canoe-ing, paddle boat-ing, and snorkling. YEAH!
Ever find someone's beauty radiates, permeates, and magnetizes you toward them? And they're not even in the same room...
place of Our Lord Jesus Christ. So, you can’t pray through Him anymore, He
Michael A. Asciak, 47, Ridgefield, N.J.
She’s in outer space.
No more will I try to please
“Okay. I’ll be back in a few minutes,” and she backed out from Jane’s room on her way to her own.
There is an extremely boring, builder grade master bathroom (not pictured) directly to the left of the dressers that is open to the bedroom. I'd like to do something in there as well eventually.
I’ll check in on you from time to time, while using free Wi-Fi at Starbucks or Burger King, watching the latest movies via the iTunes store, taking credit card payments with PayPal into my bank account, and reading the SA news on my affordable iPad, while talking on my iPhone. ANC - You are screwing your people, and I hope that - before you become Mugabe II - that the revolution will happen, and you will be deposed by an angry population. Even then, I won’t come back, because South Africa - your PEOPLE need to heal. I will return when South Africans once again stand proud, stand tall, ‘maak plan’ and unite. When South Africa has the South African put back into it - then it will be my home. Until then, I am British now, and I am proud that - despite the country’s shortcomings, we have a society that gives a fuck about its citizens.
The original painting by Claude Manet.
We've spent 140 days in the INOVA Fairfax NICU, which often has a census of 90+ babies. Not all of those babies are preemies (some are fighting other issues) but at the same time, not all premature babies end up in the NICU either. Prematurity is considered any birth before 37 weeks, and there are more and more "late-term" preemies who don't need NICU time, but still can have developmental problems later in life. We've personally met more than a few parents who have lost babies due to prematurity - either at birth, or weeks or months after a long NICU battle. And, I've seen my insurance claims (OMG - thank you for good insurance!) and know that Andrew is truly a million dollar baby.
I suppose if you were on the looking for design inspiration, it's not a bad way to get them. I suspect however, that most people are just a bit nosey. After all, who doesn't look in windows when people have their lights on and the curtains open? But paying - isn't that an open declaration of your noseyness? Or does the fact that it's for a good cause cancel out the prying?
Christopher Peterman decided to do just that, to follow the founder’s admonition and demand that BJU “Do right” and remove Chuck Phelps from the board. BJU, in typical fashion, rather than do the right thing, threatened Chris with expulsion if he continued to protest the school’s board member.
And don't nobody put my baby in a corner. :)
Also, I love to see a slow-burning romance, a la ANNA AND THE FRENCH KISS. They get to know each other. Anna and St. Clair become - shock! - friends. Same with the romance element in DIVERGENT. These felt wonderful and natural to me.
He was and still is bangers and mash.
Once the marshmallow frosting was whipped to the right consistency, I piped it on as fast as I could before it cooled and set. By the time I piped the last few cupcakes, the marshmallow frosting had become so difficult to pipe, it was like squeezing a giant solid marshmallow through the piping tip!
“It ain’t really about the money, it’s about the art.” she declared when pressed on the matter.
Then about half way through the run, something odd happened. I began to feel my breathing become more labored and then my throat felt like it was tightening up or closing. It really freaked me out! I stopped for a second and waved at Suzanne who was closest to me and croaked out a “wait!” I put my hands above my head and took a few deep breaths and my throat eventually settled back to normal. We walked a little then got back into the run only to have my throat do the same thing after a few minutes. So we walked again and caught up to Paige. We began running again and again my throat began closing up.
16And he that sat on the cloud thrust in his sickle on the earth; and the earth was reaped.
Maybe Noah, after all, had insight which my rabbi missed, namely that “the earth was corrupt” and “all flesh had corrupted their way upon the earth.” Maybe there simply wasn’t any other way. If we direct our focus at the two cases with both Avraham Avinu and Moshe Rabenu, A”S, there were people who were destroyed. There are people who have reached such a high degree of wickedness that no hope is left for them. Surely we can agree about that even today, recounting names such as Hitler, Hussein, Pol Pot, and others.
I’ve been talking to this guy I met on that dating website and I know two things about him:
What do you think the appeal of cyberpunk is? There’s an obvious visual answer, I suppose. The visuals, both of on-screen and written cyberpunk, are great. There’s a jarring sensation when we see a person, get very close, and realize their eyes have a brand name stamped into the corneas. It has something to do with the uncanny and the grotesque. A sweet metal arm with chip inserts and LED lights is both familiar and unfamiliar — uncanny. It reminds us of things we’d rather not remember, like how we could lose an arm, need a replacement; it even reminds us of what it is to be human. We think of humanity as something biological. We’re born human, aren’t we? So are people with mechanical, or even biomechanical, limbs less human somehow? We would of course say no about people now, with simple limb replacements that strive to duplicate the original, missing part.
It's not exactly news that it's shop 'til you drop on my US journeys
For the longest time what I was expressing to friends and family I was female and was laughed at or made fun of or was told it was a phase in my life, well for all medical and legal matters I am genetically female, the only male existence is the penis. I have estrogen in my body at the level 45, the average female is between 25 – 75. I am now officially just using estrogen, no spiro and no pre estrogen.
The summer seemed to start with the end of my treatment. Up until then, the twins had been in Ecole/Summer Camp. About a week after radiation ended, we hopped a plane for Chicago. I will add that Creed & Zelda have flown many times and this one was better than ever. Creed was chatty and engrossed with any movement and mechanical curiosity. Zelda, fiercely dedicated to her new iPod, could actually tell me when the plane was going up, coming down and turning, through sheer feeling.
Once in awhile I will deviate from my blog purpose and today is going to be one of those days…
Angela was one tough cookie, on the outside. Her tough exterior masked an inward heart of gold. Angela was always helping someone out during a tough time. She recently retired from a long-lasting career spanning over 40 years.
Creating a yearbook is great way for a chapter to have a visual recording and documentation of the past year, and can also serve as a recruiting tool for future members. Three winning yearbooks will be announced at the June Illinois Regional Convention at Harper College in Palatine.
I like my steaks pretty natural, just fresh cracked pepper with kosher salt. Rub in an extra amount, and I let them sit for a few hours in the refrigerator, then on the counter for a half hour or so. I don't like throwing cold meat onto the grill. I grill on preheated medium-high for about 4 minutes on one side, and another 4 on the other. I would recommend more if you like yours more than medium!
I stopped to refuel 52 miles into the ride at a Freedom gas station north of Hudson, Wisconsin. I chatted a little with another cyclist outside as we took in our calories. I told him I was heading toward Stillwater and he cautioned me about the hill leading to the bridge just east of the city. "It's a nasty hill" he said. I tucked the information away. It would be good information to have. I headed off again.
As Grits has emphasized before, the number of DNA exonerees represents just a small sample of the total number of innocent people convicted and incarcerated in Texas. After all, biological evidence exists in less than 10% of violent crimes to begin with, meaning for every DNA exoneree there are likely nine other innocent people who DNA cannot exonerate. But when you add to that Johnson's observation that most jurisdictions do not retain old biological evidence, the chance of postconviction exoneration for most innocent convicts become slim indeed. In this recent post, Grits compiled the various available estimates of actual innocence rates to guesstimate that some 2-3,000 people at any given time are locked up in TDCJ for a crime they didn't commit (estimates range from 1,200 to 5,000+).
Some of you have asked about buying calenders and vanilla from me. Is that something more than a few are interested in? If so, I'll look into some ways to make that happen. Not really sure how to go about it without using Etsy or something, but I'll check it out.
1. Tell them to get the heck away from you.
This time my work environment is less stress full but there is still some stress with working nights on a 5-2 schedule. And on days where I just can't stop throwing up my supervisor sends me home or just tells me to stay home.
Leave on your counter for 24 hours and then place in the freezer.
the only rule was for my creation to measure under 12 x 14 inches...
A bit silly and nonsensical, but this rhyme "flew" into my mind when I started thinking about today's subject, the Red-winged Blackbird.
Except the doctor doesn’t give me a prescription. He writes a letter to A&E. This is a precaution, something to do with internal wranglings within the NHS, you know, coulda, shoulda, woulda been the Chest clinic, but first A&E.
Let me here interject: my thinking on this subject is largely influenced by Kathleen Hulser and Jan Ramirez, curators at New-York Historical Society when we did the exhibition Reading Uncle Tom’s Image: A Reconsideration of Harriet Beecher Stowe’s 150-Year-Old Character and His Legacy on the occasion of the novel’s 150th anniversary. I’ve been thinking about them a lot lately….the recent Bowery event reminded me of the exhibition on THAT topic they also curated. In retrospect it occurs to me what unique and important work they were doing. The culture needs it more than ever.
My mind races as I think of your erection. My desire is to play with it, love it, and kiss it. Would you like that?
Button from Papertrey Ink
The second panel is a lot simpler in design than the first. Mostly, because I wanted to really showcase the large piece of marbleized silk on the top.
Relaxing evenings.
James Michael Starr Printmaking, because I love the contrast of the mechanics of the process with the simplicity of the product. I was a graphic designer for about 30 years, so I also find very appealing the idea of reclaiming that application of my skills (two-dimensional design and production) for my own purposes instead of those of a client.
Dr. Scott Earle’s love of mountains dates from World War II service in the Army’s 10th Mountain Division in Camp Hale, Colorado. Following World War II, he attended medical school and subsequently trained as a surgeon. Dr. Earle practiced surgery in Sun Valley, Idaho, for more than a decade, then accepted an appointment to the faculty of Case Western Reserve University School of Medicine in Cleveland. He spends much of the year in the mountains of Idaho. A lifelong love of nature, mountains and photography is reflected in this book.
You see, government officials know that they, their friends and close family members are free to profit from the sale of government lands and they don’t want to limit this activity as the legal declaration of the Scotland National Park will do.
I am blessed with this amazing girl child who is the most spontaneous, alive, zestful, playful being imaginable.
I am now selling bow holders that range from $10 to $20, depending on the size and what you want on it. All my stuff can be in your colors of choice and personalization is free. You can check out my Etsy shop which is listed on my blog page, or you can go to my facebook page and check out my current designs there. I have attached a photo, so you can get a sneak peak of what you can find in my shop. Come by and take a look...Thanks!
How can I waste a whole day?
"we shall pay any price, bear any burden,"
I’m still running through several post human texts but what’s left of the human (without circling around the subject) troubles Thierry Bardini (Junkware) and perhaps Parika (Insect Media) but to a lesser extent. With the temporal dimension taken out, or without posthumanism simply meaning transhuman (in the hyper cybernetic sense) and then the task becomes how the posthuman is different (or not) from the inhuman or nonhuman. The issue is how inhuman is the human after Deleuze – how inhuman can thought be and still be philosophy as he constructs it?
I don't know what this is. It has pink flowers, which will open shortly.
crushed in court without a defender. The hungry consume his harvest,
Arizona 28-Feb 29 29 0 0 0
MacDonald says research showing a correlation between poverty and crime has been motivated by misplaced liberal sympathies toward the black and Hispanic underclass. She scoffs at criminologist Andrew Karmen, who examined the drop, in the early 1990's, of New York City's homicide rates.
Yes, it’s that movie. The one your friend likes because “it’s like super topical and funny and really says what people are trying to say, you know?” The one your artsy friend brings to your apartment because “nobody’s heard of it, but I swear it’s a classic. It’s so witty!” It’s that movie you know, beyond shadow of a doubt, will suck harder than children’s birthday parties.
I'm excited to announce that I've just launched my new line of locker magnets. Right now, all of my designs are revolving around the upcoming New Moon movie premiere, but I have lots more ideas to come.
Instead of painfully dragging on like we all know
2. Whisk flour, baking powder and salt together and set aside. Cream butter and sugar on a high until pale, light, and fluffy (about 5 minutes).
In Calgary, Paul Hughes one man is staking his case for a backyard coop on the Canadian Charter of Rights and Freedoms as well as the United Nations Right to Food policies. Paul Hughes wants to enshrine his right to collect eggs from his own chickens without having to start a farm on the outskirts of the city.
Artichoke or fartichoke?
I usually work with strips of fabric from 1" wide up to 2.5" wide as if I'm using batting strips for the block it makes sure that they are securely anchored and I think they look better to have more variety of colours in each block.
Lately, though, my three year old has been all arms and elbows and knees and restlessness and wriggling and discomfort. Rocking, at times, has become something of a chore. She is getting big. It is hard to hold her on my lap as comfortably. I have wondered to myself, reluctantly, if it is time to give up this, our favorite ritual.
Finally, a politician with some balls. And integrity.
I realized today that my kiddie sticker collection only had 'boy'-themed stickers... hardly any 'pink-ish' flower/butterfly ones (forget dolls :D). The letters and number are all Printasticks.The paper is from Itsy Bitsy.
So, there I was on the road from Dunsmuir to Oregon enjoying the snow-covered Mt. Shasta and Black Butte Summit; the farmhouses and barns; the cows, goats and sheep grazing on the hillside; the covered bridges; and the mountain crags and streams running along the freeway, all while pulling of the road pictures.
We skipped pudding as we were stuffed.
The Old Post Office Pavilion is one of those places that you need to “get to before it is gone.” Not that the building is going anywhere, but what is being floated now is having Donald Trump renovate it into a luxury hotel. No, really, that is the plan. For right now though you can go in and enjoy the huge, soaring space and all of the “castle” like details both inside and out.
It sounds ridiculous right? But THAT'S how stubborn he is. That's Jordan.
I first encountered this word on Facebook about 3 or 4 years ago. It was "Doppelganger Week" and everyone was changing their Facebook profile pictures to celebrities that they looked like (or that looked like them). A lot of my friends really did look like certain celebrities. Some people were even lucky enough to look like more than one person. I had some friends that at first glance, I didn't realize it wasn't a picture of them. I was kind of sad because I've never been told I look like a certain celebrity nor have I ever felt like I looked like one. I didn't have anyone to change my profile picture to.
Lots of FLUFF, like glitter, I like lots of Fluff! I went to my local dollar store and bought a pack of white with glitter embedded into the tissue paper, and another pack of colored paper that included, Red, Pink, Dark Pink, and some Green. I also went to Joann's for some Valentine's open stock paper.
4) The info announcements via RDS on the radio screen are also inconsistant. Sometimes it would scroll the number across of the person who is dialing. And most of the time it would not.
His attacker then pinned him to the ground and made repeated stabbing motions towards his back, the court heard.
Until the next time we write...
When he came back, Queenie said she would go down there and search herself.
Day 4- Avoiding Foolishness
Technology; there to help us, make our lives easier, but I swear that it is also the bain of my existence most days. Whatever happened to the simple little phone that you could make and receive calls on? Remember how excited we all were when sms / text messages came out – wow, what technology! Now we can send HD pictures wirelessly, music, e-mails, all through a little smart phone that I wanted to smash into the wall… But seeing as the phone was only 24 hours old, I didn’t think that that was the best idea…
We're in NYC visiting for an extended trip and I've been having a blast! Definitely my favorite city on earth!
Jennifer Westfeldt: be your own woman, either as an actor or director. We need you to do something more than fluffy rom-coms; but if that’s your métier, you’ve got to be committed to the genre. Don’t make me write another review that begins, “I didn’t hate this movie” — because I think I really will hate the next one.
‘No,” Brodsky replied. “The wisdom to whether it would advance the public interest.”
The moment when that butterfly could have been taken gently in your cupped hands so you could feel it fluttering against your palms is over, gone, just like that moment when she looked through the crowded room and seemed to notice only you. You should have gone to her then; but now the room seems bare without her, like the flower after the brightly coloured slowly flickering butterfly has taken to the air and just become a rapidly fading blur in the distance.
The release of a handful of prominent microfinance impact assessment evaluations in 2009 precipitated a good deal of media coverage. Stories published in the Economist magazine, the Boston Globe, and the Financial Times presented the new research with a negative slant, collectively suggesting that microfinance isn’t as powerful an anti-poverty tool as suggested by many of its proponents. These media stories should be read with a healthy dose of skepticism, as even the authors of the research papers cited in the articles have made public statements disputing the oversimplifications and negative interpretations appearing in the press. One aim of this paper is to summarize the results of these new studies, disentangling the media interpretation from the actual findings reported.
Pears and red currants
Do you see a theme? This Jehovah’s Witness is focused on – even obsessed with – outward, external fluff. It’s all fluff. I mean, it’s great that he does not do drugs anymore. But that is such a gnat-sized issue when he is swallowing a camel in its place! He’s focusing on fluff when he could have Jesus. He is embracing a facade of morality when he could have Jesus HIMSELF – who is the only one who is truly righteous.
After checking out of our hotel, we were to meet up in Sedona for an early afternoon image review session. My concern was that the forecast called for 90% chance of showers throughout the day and we had a planned sunset shoot at Oak Creek Crossing. I began to get excited as a quick check of the Doppler Radar showed that the front was indeed hitting Sedona, but it was only 9am and were weren’t planning on arriving until 5:30pm. Outside of Flagstaff, we met the storm front head-on. We experienced everything from a dust storm, to heavy rain, to finally snow in Flagstaff! The snow continued as we began our descent into Sedona via Oak Creek Canyon, but began to lighten as we made our way down the canyon from 7,000 – 4,000 feet. By the time we arrived at our hotel in Sedona, we were treated to blue skies and I was somewhat dismayed. But my co-instructor Gary Hart quickly reminded me that unstable air follows fronts and that the clouds would more than likely materialize.
Men have this ……propensity to skin a cat…….anyway they can…….rules be damned. Breakin the rules…….takin a risk…….. Playin it safe doesn’t get you in the highlight reel. I think it’s important for women to understand that. Growing up…..boys aren’t applauded by their dads for being conservative. In fact …..boys are typically belittled if their efforts aren’t up to par. I see a lot of mixed messages. Moms….try desperately to make their sons “stand still” and dads who try to make them run faster. It doesn’t surprise me that boys turn out to be men that will ultimately let you down. I admit it. We’re not very smart. Give us conflicting signals and were sure to disappoint you when you want us to be generous, kind, and trustworthy material. LOL clear message? FAIL.
A few days before Duncan's obnoxious review, the New York Times published a more thoughtful review of recent genre fiction by Dana Jennings. Jennings correctly identified Geoff Ryman's "Pol Pot's Beautiful Daughter" as one of the most powerful stories of the past decade. "Pol Pot's Beautiful Daughter" is a ghost story by a genre writer, but I would be surprised to learn that Glen Duncan has ever in his career written a passage as beautiful or thought-provoking.
Type of Installation
Today's spotlight is on Michelle Belto. Michelle has developed her own luscious technique and I have to admit, there is a big part of me that wishes I weren't teaching at EncaustiCamp so I would be free to take Michelles workshop!
I didn't make a conscious decision to begin writing Historical Fiction, but once I'd written Witch Child and its sequel, Sorceress, then other ideas popped up for further books set in the past. Like all writers, I found my own way of working, ways of researching, my own answers to the problems with voice and language that writing in this particular genre throws up. I also made some rules for myself.
The things that mark an apostle–signs, wonders and miracles–were done among you with great perseverance. (2 Cor 12:12)
But that’s not all, folks…
It is ridiculous that only weeks after a games fall release I can buy that already cheap 59.99$ game for as little as 29.99$. Seeing brand new big budget games going for less then a quarter what I paid during the N64 days. That truly scares me, I am scared for the industry.
Also just for general educational purposes this is what is known as amigurumi, a Japanese style of knit or crocheted small dolls or animals (or whatever). For more on amigurumi click here. When crocheted they are typically done in all single crochet in the round and thus are not difficult to make (except for the working with very small pieces which may give you an aneurysm. Or a seizure. Or at the very least arthritis.). If you don't know how to crochet go here. It's not for everyone but I like it. When knitting amigurumi they are made with stockinette stitch (Making one of those now. It's an owl. And it's for Anneliese. Don't tell her.).
Last year I attended a course designed for aspiring account planners. In simple terms, account planners are advertising agency people who work to understand the consumer's view in order to create communication that resonates with them(the consumer). The discipline of planning has different approaches and it boils down to the agency culture and the type of planner working on any particular campaign.
It has subtitles.
Pinsky drily said he assumed Brodsky was referring to his “Soviet-style” quote.
The India Ocean Dipole (IOD) is a seesawing of ocean water temperatures in west and Indian Ocean, closely resembling the El Nino-La Nina phenomenon in the equatorial Pacific but with more direct and immediate impact on Indian monsoon.
Anyway, after seeing the current PDCC colours, the idea bulb lit up in my head. Have you seen sunglasses with blue and pink shades? I have! Very funky and retro.I also wanted to use the PDCC colours other than for a flower or an elegant card.
It all came clear to me
